Her close-cropped hair, blackened eye and scarred cheek were all dead giveaways to the other mercs in the room of her own shield-maiden status.
Persephone is one of the gazillion characters you can read about in Greek mythology. She's the daughter of Zeus (the big guy) and Demeter, goddess of the harvest and the underworld. It's no wonder then that Persephone (or Proserpina in Roman mythology) was the goddess of vegetation.
Tips to trim officiant costs: If you or a family member is close to minister, pastor, or judge, ask to see if they are willing give you a discount or officiate for free. If not, ask a family member or friend to get the proper certification to officiate.
"For hop-forward, American style IPA’s and IIPA’s, nothing beats the higher carbonation and extra chill of a keg. Sampling any of them at the GBBF bar that CAMRA forced into gravity dispense casks proved that … although it seems the mere presence of them at the festival is testament to CAMRAs forward thinking …"
This "recipe" consisted of blanching green beans, frying up pancetta, combining the two with a bit of butter, and serving up. I like pancetta, I like beans. I do not like pancetta and beans. My tongue wanted more. It felt like drinking orange-spice tea without the little pinch of sugar. It felt like an English muffin without the butter. It was the Sunday Times without the funnies or crossword puzzles.
So go and you can know too! :D
This group follows a rigid code of conduct and have very little to do with anyone else, even other Christians. They adhere to Biblical teaching, but only use their founder’s translation. The group, as a whole, is made up of numerous smaller assemblies spread across the globe. Each local assembly has a designated leader who answers to the area leader. Each area leader answers to the continent’s leader, who then reports to the universal leader, or ‘man of god’. This chain of command can get quite cumbersome as no local leader would make an assembly decision without first finding out what the ‘man of god’ thinks he should do. These assembly decisions can be anywhere from determinations in business or marriage, to member discipline or monthly conventions.
the glance of your eyes, the touch of your
Forgive me if I don my suspicious, alternative-agenda querying hat. Someone at twitter suggested I was being paranoid the other day. Well, as they say ‘just because you’re paranoid it doesn’t mean they’re not out to get you’.
First, I realize it’s not Halloween. You don’t have to call the crazy police on me.
The white paper’s justification for claim-jumping the TV spectrum is the explosion of bandwidth consumption by ever more data-hungry smartphones. Anyone who’s ever heard FCC Chairdude Julius Genachowski utter a word since he unveiled the white paper is familiar with his “looming spectrum crises” rhetoric. Not today, he’s admitted, but in the future, when I’m back in the private sector developing wireless broadband start-ups.
WHERE: My Place Residence Hall Katipunan (near KFC)
Add next 7 ingredients to baking dish and toss with hands to mix. Cover with plastic wrap (if making ahead).
ME: Lady… I don’t know what kind of weird kink you’re into, but…
It's that time again .... time to make application to craft shows for the coming year! Some of the shows this summer have application deadlines coming up soon. So just how does a person go about locating and choosing a craft show?
It propelled him to go ahead and detain Bon Bon (Samantha Daniel) for questioning. (She’s John Mayer/Kim Bong Gu’s (Yoon Je Moon’s personal assassin. And yup, that’s really the name the drama gave that character because of her penchant for chocolate.)
I'm just not totally convinced yet. Some questions nagging me are: how dangerous is it for sleepy children to walk down those steps at night (to go to the toilet)? And the practicality of changing bedlinen? And don't they ever fall out?!
08. Egoshooter
Participants included chefs, restaurant owners, food bloggers and food writers, among other food industry influencers.
Scene: Kirsten's office. Angie's there too.
It was a bit of an uphill climb and the views along the way were awesome!
Thanks to those of you who have already been such and encouragement!
require that the behavior would cause a reasonable person to feel fear. Some states require both actual
First, I thought we were a country where one of the purposes of candidates going around was to actually learn about the states they campaigned in and actually be responsive to the needs of the states they campaign in. For example, the port of Jacksonville is going to have to be expanded because the Panama Canal is being widened, and I think that’s useful thing for a president to know. I think it’s important for presidents to know about local things.
So how did I get Math Work Stations set up and started? Well first I purchased matching bins with blue tops from Kmart. Why blue tops well a) they're pretty and b) I can quickly identify them as my math bins and c) Well when they are all uniform they make my room look more organized! Then came the "I Can" charts on top. After much trial and error I found that when I put them on the in side of the box tops (as suggested in the book) my kids didn't look at them. I tried them in the actual bins (and until they get laminated that's how it works) but the I Can page often was left on the carpet and not put away. So I settled on velcroing them to the top. Voila! Don't they look beautiful! :-D
Sometimes I even cook by candle light. The kids sure do love it. They come in sometimes and talk, asking, "Why I do it?"
I guess after you’ve seen three of the four members dive into the pit, mid song, nothing they do after could ever really compare. They played all the songs that kept the fans crushed up against the barriers and finished off with a thunderous rendition of The Ace of Spades. 4 fists.
Sarah 5646766
Four thousand people or more had been collected here, and that was what they called a regiment. There was ne’er a bathhouse or laundry, and no one was given any uniform. They marched us off to work straightaway. What they told us in the support force for the Locomotive Works was: “You keep going till you drop.”
but is it easy to tat?
Following this blissful display of the environment in its unadulterated state, we are introduced to the character of man by way of his violent intrusion—specifically, through a rock face demolition. The music becomes darker and more menacing as various vehicles and implements of destruction are paraded before us, exhibiting their handiwork upon the land. Indeed, man is seen as secondary to his machines; the emphasis is not on the individual, but on the changes he brings to his domain. Power lines and hydroelectric dams give way to freeways and landing strips, and the rise in population is reflected in the increasingly cluttered landscape.
The biscuits had no specific density and went down like buttery puffs of joy, until you realized you had eaten too many of them. Still, the waitress, frenzied between the packed tables, came back with a bright smile, a pot of coffee, and a fresh plate of biscuits seconds from the oven. You could dip them in your red eye gravy, in your coffee, or smear them with fresh strawberry preserves, put one up your nose, another under an armpit, and a half dozen in your purse or backpack for later. You had sex with them at the table, toasting your triumph with another cup of coffee before rolling into them again.
And for all of you out there who think that having good experiences with couch surfing may actually be a bad idea in the long run because it’ll make me too easily trusting of people… Phooey. Maybe life’s jaded you a bit, too. Boo Hiss.
Sweet Love
Even with the world falling apart, and the Realm threatening to bleed into my world, I take comfort in his love and kiss. For now. I take the strength he offers me, and I offer him mine.
Well, I don't see any perfect conservatives this time around either. I initially supported Rick Perry, but he just wasn't able to sell himself... so now that Perry is gone, Romney has become my second choice. Who else am I supposed to vote for? Rick Santorum may yet win the nomination, and I will vote for him if he does, but I don't see how he could possibly beat Obama in the general election. (I don't think that Newt Gingrich could beat Obama either, but I don't see him winning the nomination at this point anyway, so the question is probably moot.)
Clean the house and work on laundry
The Barras is an odd sort of tourist attraction, as many traders do not wish to be photographed, a normal tourist activity elsewhere in the world. It has been described as one of the biggest markets for counterfeit goods in Europe.
2. d. If the prerequisites for surprise no longer exist, for instance, because inhabitants appear by chance, the chosen site must be immediately abandoned if the troublesome witnesses cannot be eliminated silently.
Don't be fooled by this breakfast item, it was actually a late night snack. With fresh raspberries in my fridge, I felt the need to be all decadent and fancy with my food. This is such a easy recipe that exact measurements are really unnecessary.
*edit: “Ringo” was initially used in this entry as the name for the entity possessing Himari. Thanks to some sleuthing by Raph, it seems that our research was incorrect and Ringo is actually a completely different character. Sorry about the mistake.
Love you when we’re apart.
Momentary lapse of reason
We know when the truth
CHANNA MASALA USING EASILY FOUND INGREDIENTS
And I never will forget it
Flock by Wendy Delsol: I am super, super excited to get an e-galley of the last book in the Stork trilogy. I loved Stork and consider it to be one of my favorite books. I wasn't quite as impressed with Frost, the sequel, but I am really looking forward to seeing how the trilogy ends. This doesn't come out until September, but I'm sure I won't be able to resist reading it for very long!
DO YOU LIKE THIS RECIPE? SIGN UP FOR A FREE E-MAIL SUBSCRIPTION AND YOU'LL NEVER MISS A NEW RECIPE. A Veggie Venture is the food blog about vegetables, home to the famous A-Z of Vegetables and second-generation food writer and 'veggie evangelist' Alanna Kellogg. For 'home delivery' of new vegetable recipes from A Veggie Venture, sign up here. Once you do, new recipes will be delivered, automatically, straight to your e-mail In Box. Subscriptions are free and every recipe includes nutrition information, Weight Watchers points and Alanna's tips and tricks, useful ideas for new and experienced cooks alike.
I am thankful for God's love and abundance that gives us enough love to share if we allow Him to use us.
Republican state Sen. Paul Hornback didn’t go that far, but the tobacco farmer from Shelbyville said in a phone interview that he sees industrial hemp as an alternative crop that could give Kentucky agriculture a boost if it ever gains a legal foothold.
Our values tend to reflect this as well; indeed, our definition of success is does not include how much money or how big of a house you have, but how happy and healthy you are, how meaningful your life is to you, and how kindly you treat one another and the earth itself.
BBQ catering is gradually becoming an essential part for the life of many people worldwide. It’s because BBQ is a wonderful way to socialize and celebrate during these harder economic times. It can replace any expensive celebration and is ideal for different occasion including anniversaries, holidays, birthdays, engagements, christenings, Christmas and many more.
We are We are We are
That’s a hard one to remember,
because I am me
Least one of us got a work out.
Luckily there is always this - the incredible Chobe river, and our special part where hardly anybody else goes. We launch our boat literally a few minutes away from home, and we are in another world. Stunning cloud formations at this time of year are very photogenic...
We may just have found ourselves a young, fresh soul diva.
Anne-Marie Lemay, 22 - mechanical engineering
Lisa was still sulking when I escorted her to the jungle next day. “Top three! huh!” she muttered angrily, twisting her lips into a snarl. I explained that the man was an investment banker, a breed incapable of moral or aesthetic judgements and intoxicated with the smell of their own farts. I added that anyone could see that she was carrying the show in its last three series – Courtney Cox had lost her looks by then and Jennifer Aniston was as funny as a wet dishcloth. She said nothing, but gave me an appreciative wink.
At this point we can see God’s grace illustrated. Saul is physically bankrupt. He is spiritually destitute. In all ways, he has literally been stopped in his tracks. He has nowhere to turn but to the one Who stopped him, Jesus Christ. So his reply in verse 10; “What shall I do, Lord?” So it is that today many, if not most, will not turn to the Lord until they come to the end of themselves.
The April Kit Tutorial will come to you in a pdf format via e-mail.
I'm walkin' on eggs and I'm climbin' on thread.
One other thing I really have to mention about this manga is that I love that all of the character names are completely sensical and could feasibly exist in the real world! This is not always the case with foreign names in manga, so I am very happy with Isayama-sensei’s name choices!
His most profound observation on them, though, is at the heart of why any kind of social/political/religious agreement or mutual understanding with them is impossible. He writes of them:
I am typing to you with tears in my eyes because I am unable to have the birth I want because I don't have enough money. Is there anything I can do?
I was amazed by how many runners I saw outside today. It was as if the whole of Paris woke up this morning and said, "Here we go, getting 2011 off to a good start with a nice run now that I'm over that HORRID HANGOVER!". I wish someone would start a website to track it. "Resolution Run 2011" or something, so we can see how many of them put on their running shoes, just to take them off again a week later. Anonymous results, bien sur.
Well – my kids went, “Blech!”
For me it’s the two-year anniversary of my meeting Martin in the restaurant in Dublin, Ireland. That was a good day. A day for me that signified an end to my despair and pain of the break up of my 18-year marriage and the dawning of a new and happy future filled with adventure, smiles, and hope. Tonight, I’m going to look forward instead of back.
...Work suddenly became very hard to find, and his search for it was not helped by his drinking and depression. Friends say that he lost confidence, as can happen quickly to a man caught up in a confidence game.
Oh, and on top of getting sick, Carter got his top two canine teeth in last week. Of course.
A strong counter –argument to the idea of the participatory panopticon, which itself rests on an assumption of inevitability and technological determinism, (c.f. the quote from McNealy – similar sentiments have been expressed by other prominent figures in IT and data mining industries such as ex Google CEO Eric Schmidt), is the charge that such extensive scrutiny renders us all into automatons – hence the “chilling” effect referred to by Zittrain above. Indeed, Zittrain compares the situation to that of politicians whenever they are in the public eye – and he implies – they have been the first to understand and adapt to “Privacy 2.0” in their public behaviour (even if they are disastrous at articulating and applying these concepts) and as such we should regard their behaviour in modern times as the canary in the coal mine:
My new bra is too small and pinches, so I didn’t wear one at all, and now I’m at the point where my boobs (untethered) rest on my giant belly. I looked like a hairy gross buddha.
Then we placed the leaf in the spot we wanted in the fabric piece.
Is it wrong that I'm gonna be having the time of my life
Fiona: "Yeah yeah. Jenna. It was Jenna's birthday. So you were...were watching her...who's a lot better lookin' than me."
Prince of Thorns is the first volume in a powerful new epic fantasy trilogy, original, absorbing and challenging.
I stayed pretty true to the original layout. I switched Choup72's embellishments for some more dimensional ones,- the kind I would normally use. I think the best way to do a lift is to try and make it your own and that's what I did here.
Lee said, “Losses kill me. The way I’m wired, I’m embarrassed every time we lose. You very rarely remember the wins, but the losses stay with you for a long time.”
To A Daughter,
CITY HALL – cedula
I couldn’t look myself in the eyes. I avoided the mirror as much as I could when I went in to get a tissue. I couldn’t breathe and had to blow my nose. I was starting to hyperventilate. It was my own stupid fault. Why did I feel it necessary to read that? After all, I knew that once I’d written about it I was supposed to keep that memory locked away in “the safe place.” Put it so far back in my mind that I could forget about it enough to be able to function normally again.
Eventually, Florya is crammed into a wooden church with the rest of the villagers. A German officer announces a grim ultimatum: anyone can leave the church as long as they leave their children behind. Numbly, Florya exits the barn where he is gruffly shoved aside.
And the colors of the world
But they aren't all gold, the most disappointing Christmas album purchase was the Beach Boys - not a name that instantly reminds you of winter and snow admittedly, but I thought I'd give it a go anyway. It is truly awful, and the fact 'Little Saint Nick' is included no less that 3 times, shows they were probably struggling from the off.
After a bit, she wanted to go on the swings. Not the big girl swings but the baby ones. The one Ashlin was in last time we were there. Fine. Ashlin is staying in the stroller. I wasn’t allowed to push her though. Weird kid. Eventually she wanted to get out, so we did the wiggle, wiggle, wiggle dance to get her out of the too-small swing. The slightly wet sand under the swings was the next source of gravity, and she crouched down to grab a handful. And peed her pants.
I originally wrote this post several months ago. But, when it came time to share it - my heart was too raw to really share it with a right heart. Last week, God brought this whole thing to mind again and I was reminded that I don't want to forget how I witnessed God's hand. And, I want my children to hear my testimony of His grace.
My years in school in the USA pushed me to think quickly. From spelling bees to timed essay exams, it was always important to form your thoughts as quickly as possible, to “think on your feet” as we sometimes say. An unforgettable approach came from Sister Helen Marie, my 7th grade English teacher at a Catholic girls school. She used a stack of yellow response cards, each with a name on it and spaces for recording grades. At the beginning of class every day, Sister would shuffle these cards and begin quizing us on our homework, calling on the person whose card appeared on top and grading that response then and there. In spite of the random order, I always had a strange premonition just before I was going to be called. One night I even dreamed of the yellow cards and the next day, my card was on top of the stack and I had to write my outline on the blackboard. Just as it happened in my dream, after I completed writing it on the board, Sister Helen Marie told me it was too long and detailed, and she wrote down a grade.
BUT either these will work out or I will donate them to a charity of some kind. Either way, I'm happy. It starts the year off good for me, and I'm pleased with that. PLUS, as a sweeper, we are kind of superstitious and feel that any win on a Monday (which is today) is good luck and means that you are likely to win another contest/sweepstakes before the end of the week.
All the other series will continue as they have been running—Barbie Angell’s & L.E. Leone’s poems will appear on alternate Tuesdays; Rose City Wednesday & Sunday’s Photo of the Week will continue to appear weekly. There will be no regularly scheduled posts on Thursday or Saturday, but I will leave them open (especially Thursday) for things that may come up thru the week; that's also at least theoretically true for the open Mondays & Fridays. Anyhow, that's pretty much how things have been for a while.
High on the priority list when we arrived home was to tackle the garden. We've had so much rain and the grass is really green and looks lovely when its mown - hubby's job. I spent Saturday afternoon tidying up some of the garden beds and once again tangled with the 'wild' life - not wasps this time, but ants - I'm not sure what type they are but they have an intensely painful sting. I ended up with 13 attacks! The worst part is the after-effects. I always seem to have a reaction to insect bites, so I now have huge, insanely itchy lumps on swollen legs! It all reinforces what a good move it was, when I retired seven years ago, to put stitching higher on the list of leisure activities than gardening!
The gasworks leak their vapor to the air
“Why should women be paid equal to men? Men have been in the working world a lot longer and deserve to be paid at a higher rate.
If not a holy man he could have been a squaddie;
The Ninth Circuit case is Miranda Fuentes v. Holder, No. 11-72641. The BIA ruling under challenge is Matter of E-R-M-F- & A-S-M-, 25 I&N Dec. 580 (BIA 2011).
Yes, regulating this activity would be complicated; so is rocket science, but we don't throw up our hands and say it's too hard.
I darkened the center of each individual bud with V04 because that color is"lilac". Again, I liked it. Way to go Copic! Two colors that look exactly like what the name says they are.
CONGRATS on finishing up the first year of Law School :) It was rough, but you did it! Just two more years, and those are going to fly by my love...
Not only did I get my big ticket item, I got a lot of the other stuff I asked for too.
Here's what my collab collage looks like right now:
06 Moonage Daydream
They all had elements that I thought would work well together, so I decided to unite them with a common color scheme and turn these thrift store castoffs into a fantastic and one-of-a-kind full size bedroom set.
Post a new comment
In short, it means more money, as we’re very strong in both the English Language and translation markets.
"I wasn't confident at that time that I knew what happened," Tyson said. "It still seems clear to me that something ugly happened in that house. ... I don't think people should be used as things. If there only had been an ugly incident and no allegations of rape, I still would be disappointed with the students."
sure fits the bill!
I found myself laughing in the driveway. There are people in the world starving, homeless, orphaned, so how dare I balk in the face of all that - at merely saying goodbye to a stupid (excuse my use of the s-word) vehicle? That stinkin' pride. Always sneakin' up and givin' me grief.
Happy Friday to you!!
At the bottom of the cliff, my long-suffering wife and I just looked at each other and shared a silent moment. Then my 5 year old son piped up from the back “Daddy, can you please make up your mind if you want to go up the hill or down the hill because you’re sort of getting on my nerves, a little bit.”
Aside from writing, Kate Miller-Heidke is ruling my life these days. I discovered her last album about a year and a half ago, and her new album, Nightflight, just came out and it is frickin' amazing, guys. It's the first album in a while I've been able to immerse myself in completely. It just... works. As an album, as a story, as an experience, it all just comes together. I love that, when an album is an album, a cohesive whole.
All those crazy things you said
Papers - BG Piccadilly
I'll have to blow it up instead.
I'll leave you with a picture I took of my daughter while we were out yesterday. That smile can brighten anyone's day
“It’s just champagne, it’s not a big deal, not like you’re gonna get drunk.”
Also, it’s Jill-ee-inn, not Jiyyyann. Half the people who pronounce my name believe the latter. There is no ‘y’ in Jillian.
Waiting to remember what it was like before they were born, to remember what my hobbies are, to remember how to have a conversation that doesn’t involve potty-training techniques or immunizations or how to get them to clean their rooms.
She said nothing and kept that barrel aimed square at where my heart beat. Funny since she always claimed I didn't have one. I shrugged, downed the cheap scotch she usually kept on hand and tried to calm her down.
LÄPPLE: Söhngen usually never gave damning judgments on any author. He never refused a priori any contribution, from wherever it came. His method was to pick up and improve the good that could be found in any author and in every theological perspective, to weave the new things into the Tradition and then go ahead, indicating the further development that could follow. But in Söhngen Ratzinger also saw a willingness to rediscover Tradition understood as the theology of the Fathers. And a willingness to do theology by going back to the great sources: from Plato to
Gal 4:8-9 NET. Formerly when you did not know God, you were enslaved to beings that by nature are not gods at all. (9) But now that you have come to know God (or rather to be known by God), how can you turn back again to the weak and worthless basic forces? Do you want to be enslaved to them all over again?
I was well educated in the ‘tactics’ of the game though, as the boys took turns to explain this, that, and the other (mostly they waxed lyrical about their favourite players and their signature moves, and provided 95000 excuses for WHY nobody was playing well enough to draw any interest to the game). I heard enough hideously vulgar language to not curse myself for at least another three months, and I heard a preservice teacher I’m training with proposition two fifteen year-old girls for the princely sum of 8.95. Yep, inspiring stuff. Terrifying, actually.
He said he was "quite optimistic" about the final outcome.
94 Northcote Road
We started off happy, you and I. Free to laugh and smile and wonder what the future held for the both of us. Everything looked shiny and new when I had you beside me. The world was freshly unwrapped and sat there gleaming like a freshly shined coin. We had our whole lives together and I knew that I could make it with you by my side.
Once they find their matches, ask the groups to prepare a poster to summarize what they know about their category. Include a picture or diagram, examples of the math (equations, graphs,etc...) and at least one sentence to explain the category.
two ha’ penny,
There are websites that list meal plans and recipes for people like me, but often they are for omitting one item or maybe two, not the entire list that is applicable to me. A dairy-free site will tell me to avoid dairy if baby is fussy, but suggest cabbage or broccoli as an alternate calcium source, which also makes my baby fussy. A breastfeeding guide to nutrition cautions me to get plenty of calories, and then merrily suggests getting plenty of calcium from sources like yogurt or broccoli, which we've already established are out of the question.
2. Wash and peel off any damaged leaves from the sprouts. Trim the root end and cut in half.
This is a thorough examination of the emerging church, a name that describes a new approach to missions and church life among some “evangelicals” for these present times. Nothing has made us more conscious of the vicious battle that is raging for the very life and soul of Bible-believing churches than our research into the emergent church. It is frightful, because so many are falling into devil’s trap and so many more will doubtless fall in the coming days. At the same time, it is exciting, because it reminds us that the hour is very, very late and we need to be busy in the Lord’s service and always “looking up.” I have made a great effort to understand the emerging church. I have read more than 100 books and a great many articles by emerging church leaders. I have visited emerging congregations as well as attending with media credentials a large emerging church conference sponsored by Zondervan and InterVarsity Press. In reality, the emerging church is simply the latest heresy within the broad tent of evangelicalism. When the “new evangelicalism” swept onto the scene in the late 1940s with its bold repudiation of “separatism” and its emphasis on dialogue with heretics, the door was left open for every sort of heresy to infiltrate the “evangelical” fold, and that is precisely what has happened. The Bible does not warn in vain, “Be not deceived: evil communications corrupt good manners” (1 Corinthians 15:33). OUTLINE: I. What Is the Emerging Church? II. A Great Blending and Merging. It is difficult to draw a strict line between the two streams of the emerging church, because there is a blending and merging going on that will cause all lines to be blurred eventually. III. The Liberal Emerging Church and Its Errors. IV. The Conservative Emerging Church and Its Errors. V. Cain the First Emerging Church Worshiper. VI. Charles Spurgeon Exposed the Emerging Church. VII. Index. 489 pages. $19.95
No I’m not going there to stalk little children, I’m taking little people there to have some fun!
Eric Allen, 44, New York, N.Y.
You'll notice this week there's one shirt that's in a couple of the outfits. I'm thinking of doing a post where I would use one shirt and a pair of jeans to make a weeks worth of completely different looking outfits. What do you think, good idea? Anyway, let's get on with the show...
‘It can be both, but people like to reduce it to one or the other. I know there are the two masks, Comedy and Drama, hanging together. But that’s not the way American audiences seem to break things down.’
For Hannah Mendelsohn the therapeutic practice of arranging M&Ms into patters has generated some stunning creations. This idle pastime, plus a little hard work and determination, has placed her in the exciting world of candy art.
And Happiness,
12. My mother taught me: HYPOCRISY.
Scandal 4: The “can travel” male escort who became the BNP’s London mayor candidate.
So, if you are looking for a one of a kind gift that will truly be appreciated by the recipient or you just want to treat yourself to something extra special, take a look at KidaliaDesign's Etsy shop and I'm sure that at least one thing will catch your eye - if not everything! You can also find KidaliaDesigns on Facebook and Flickr! You can also find TommieSPhoto on Facebook, Twitter and her Website!
Recommended, but with hesitations.
The following day, I looked up from my tea and noticed the young lady again repeating the exact steps she took the day before. I looked at my watch and concluded that this was part of her routine. I decided at that moment, I would also become part of that routine.
Proximity to cheap food: 2/5 – There is a delicious restaurant inside the brewery (The Forecaster’s Pub) and others just down the street at other wineries, but the prices are around $20, if not more, per person. Other food is available if you are willing to drive a bit farther to get it. There was one sketchy tavern up the road, but even we were a little scared to go in.
Also, originally the story was called THE NINETEENTH REALITY. When Chris gave his pitch to "The Committee", whoever the heck that is, he accidentally called it THE THIRTEENTH REALITY, and everyone liked it so much it stuck. That made for a little adjusting in my plans, but not much. It's only a number. Somewhere later, the number was used instead of the word, and now it is offically THE 13TH REALITY.
There seem only two possible conclusions to reach based on such an action. First, that you were so sure the emails were squeaky-clean, a favourable opinion from Royal solicitors would be worth its weight in gold. But it is now obvious that the emails incriminated Newscorp deeply.
11.11.11 was a planned hangout date with my loves and while talking about our plans on Twitter, we’ve decided to have dinner at Manang’s for a couple of reasons; 1. I am dying to try it. Hey if people can’t stop talking about it, it must be that awesome. Right? 2. It was the grand opening of their branch in SM Mega Mall. I cannot wait for their branch in Molito to open!
Twine - Martha Stewart Crafts
The way that I understand the law, and I get my information from the Internet, is that even if one is an aggressor and during that act of aggression, if the perpetrator begins to lose the fight that they start, they have the right then to shoot and kill their intended victim and then hide behind a veil of a self-defense, perceived threat justification. It makes absolutely no sense.
Here are some useful resources for you:
All that "fun stuff" that I talked about that we do ALL the time with the kids--is FREE stuff! (or if not free, practically free)
Though ripped and pulled so often before.
There are Lots of good Stories
It is also very important that the stone is spinning. Spinning gives the stone some angular momentum, and thanks to conservation of angular momentum, the stone’s angle to the water does not change by a great deal as the stone skips (Conservation of angular momentum is also the reason why you feel much more stable when you’re riding a bicycle at a higher speed). If the stone was not spinning, it would topple as soon as it hit the water and then sink right down. So much for skipping.
B: If you were given the chance to go back and change anything from Christel Doctor Who, would you decide to do anything differently?
Yet, at best Heritage Keepers Abstinence Education ignores LGBT youth – and at worst it promotes homophobia. The stigmatization of LGBT youth throughout the program reinforces the cultural invisibility and bias these students already face in many schools and communities. The curriculum’s focus on marriage as the only appropriate context for sexual behavior further ostracizes LGBT youth and the children of LGBT parents who still cannot legally marry in most states.
“That’s your family back there?” She squeezed her eyes tighter but Greta had left for her hiding place in the back of Mattie's brain so instead she opened her eyes and looked out the window. As the bus pulled away she could regrettably see Corey in direct line of “Jacks” inquisitive finger poking at the bus window. All disappointing six feet two inches of him dwarfed by tiny terror a castrating foreman of a wife marriage was apparently laying her thick shame and disappointment at the lack luster efforts of Mattie's son as both husband and father. Either the Apple or the Orange had their arm deposited fully up the receiving end of a vending machine and was crying a fit as he screamed like a stuck pig. Mattie was thankful the bus pulled away as it did saving her the suffering of yet another one
Although his theory is valid, it's somewhat oversimplified for my taste and understanding about the general history of that period. It was just about 10,000 years ago that the last Ice Age ended quickly and produced a climate change significant enough to make food gathering much more difficult than it had previously been. The change to farming rather than following the herds while gathering what edibles could be found among the trees, grasses and tubers produced by nature was very difficult. Archeologists have determined from skeletal remains that the early generations born among the first farmers were noticeably smaller than their hunter-gatherer cousins. However, this soon changed and before long the farmer society formed divisions in its make-up we'd recognize today. Soon there were kings and standing armies to defend the land they had and grab as much more as they could defend. We can well understand that over the course of time the Leavers became more and more marginalized, until today when there aren't many left.
British, Going Live
I take a few deep breaths as I open the door trying to brace myself for what lies ahead. The door creaks loudly and swings open with a heavy feel to it.
Laps completed 59
Would you consider my query letter for your critique? Thank you!=0AAttn: (n=
(ii) where will academic publishing be in five years time.
In Salzburg Leopold Mozart, having discovered that his daughter, Nannerl, and especially his six-year-old son, Wolfgang, are musically gifted, has resolved to use their talents to secure his family fortunes and will embark with them this year on a musical tour of Europe. The Jackson Five of classical music.
Did her termination have something to do with the story about a prescription-abusing doctor, whom Sherman met on a swinger website?
I don't buy those now, but sometimes I see them in the store and feel just a little nostalgic. Fortunately, these days, I know it's super simple to make popsicles at home and having found a cheap popsicle mold at Target, I did just that recently. These watermelon popsicles were much more flavorful than my favorite childhood ones, but just as refreshing. The vodka keeps them from getting too hard, but mine definitely held their shape long enough to eat. If popsicles don't happen to be your thing, you could chill the mixture overnight then freeze it in your ice cream maker instead.
When Peter arrives at Cornelius house, he has a realization at that moment of what the dream meant as we read in verse 28, “You know it is against our laws for a Jewish man to enter a Gentile home like this or to associate with you. But God has shown me that I should no longer think of anyone as impure or unclean.”
Jesus was tough with religious blockheads, false teachers, the proud, and bullies. Jesus was tender with women, children, and those who were suffering or humble.
danny and crystal; not siblings...their parents are kinda together. ish.
Six and a half years after our last story of Jonah Hex, within the pages of a Vertigo imprint, our fearless bounty hunter surfaces once again. This time, the art is grittier, the dialogue harsher, the townsfolk dumber. All in all, this ain't your father's Jonah Hex. We'll have to decide if that is a good thing or a bad thing. (and it may end up being both!)
Against that background, the article stated as follows:
did the birds
Stone faces have been known to collapse from the weight of it–the mighty presence of a smile. And the affect on yourself? Well, you’ll see the sun come shining through… if you… just… smile.
When I watched cartoons, Jazz or classical music played in the background and Bugs Bunny was making satire out of historical events. Henry Mancini played the jazz melody on The Pink Panther. Legend great Charles Mingus played the themes song on Peanuts. There was a fusion of music and art which is missing today. Incidentally, I find the Pink Panther one of the funniest cartoons AND THE CHARACTERS NEVER TALKED! Imagine that.
But the overall effect is one of intense joy...
W2: It's not easy. I go to all the PTO meetings and work with the kids every day after school and stay real involved.
Many authors, professional and amateur, confuse bickering with conflict, but unless there is an element of desire, such as one of the characters wanting information that the other doesn’t want to give, then there is no conflict, merely disagreement. I made that mistake in Light Bringer. I had a lot of historical information I needed to impart, so I had a group of people arguing about it in the hope that it would seem more immediate, but since there was no desire, except the relative low tension one of the characters wanting to be heard, it came across as bickering. I kept the section because it was a more interesting way of presenting the material than a lecture, and it did show the personalities of the characters, but there was not the immediacy conflict would have brought to the piece.
So, I'm going to paint it!
His case marks what some observers see as a key turning point in assigning accountability to an organization that has a long history of protecting priests who abuse children.
The Angels were trailing 5-2 going into the 8th, when Palmer caved and the Halos scored 5:
Lager
President Obama addressed the nation from Afghanistan after signing a historic agreement between the United States and Afghanistan that defines a new kind of relationship between our countries — a future in which Afghans are responsible for the security of their nation, we build an equal partnership between two sovereign states, and a future in which the war ends, and a new chapter begins.
To jobs I want to sing:
I can but trust that good shall fall
I was one of those students, though I never took a course with her. For me, Ruth was mentor in two important phases of my life, and I’m grateful for her guidance.
It would also allow the various federations of the sport to utilize the monetary strength of the Olympic movement, to help develop track and field – specifically in building state of the art stadium/facilities. For example, I would encourage USATF (still in need of a CEO) to get together with the USOC to work on developing an Olympic bid with a World Championships bid in mind. Putting together a bid where hosting the Olympics provides the physical structure that has been lacking to formulate an adequate World Championships bid. Such bids could even be put together to include the potential use of the stadium for events such as Soccer’s World Cup – the ultimate idea being to create a “Sports Center” within the country that could play host to the world in multiple events.
the ones who helped raise me through elementary to college. thank you for always feeding me, loving me, listening to me, and raising daughters who are amazing women and friends to me. you were very often my ideal when i thought of what a mother should be.
What we are doing to ourselves is known in the lexicon of sexual perversion as auto-asphyxiation. I find the most honest definition of this term on the website of the provocatively named Ph.D. sexologist, Annie Sprinkle, who defines it as, “The act of hanging oneself in order to cut off oxygen and blood flow to the brain while masturbating.”
From his first impressions, Naida was a sharp and kind woman. Although he could only imagine how much of that changed when she had that sword in her hand…
Mein Irisch Kind,
The Brodzinsky team is even more blunt. “A good many adoptees consider the stress of adoption to be something they cannot change and would be better off ignoring so they can get on with their lives. These people reveal little inner turmoil about being adopted; they have either suppressed or denied or minimized the significance of adoption in their own lives.” And further, “Denial or avoidance….can be a highly adaptive strategy when an individual is faced with a stressor she cannot change, such as being adopted. In this view, an adoptee who can suppress, avoid, minimize, or deny the significance of being adopted….is able to compartmentalize this aspect of her identity and get on with her life.” And finally, “This is simply a coping style, and for may people it works…at least until a phone call from a birth mother or the uncovering of a genetic illness makes denial no longer possible.” (p.151)
Oh — she had returned from a mission in southern Greece, where she joined Olein’s team to destroy an abandoned Mantis base, so it cannot be used in the future. A quick and easy take out.
Mocality is a three-year-old startup owned by South African-based emerging market internet giant, Naspers — an US$18-billion company that has stakes in Facebook, Tencent and mail.ru — and many other emerging market internet properties dotted around the world.
my insides hurt
Best Picture: The Artist
here are a few sites to check out:
Is there anything else worth noting? Well if you're a guy I guess you might enjoy the J-Lo yoga scene, but aside from that, nothing. The entire film was just painful to watch. It wasn't funny; not even in a bad way, the plot barely made sense, the dialog made me want to punch a wall and the stars lacked quality what so ever despite their fame and so called talent. There are just so many thing wrong with this entire production that it's not even worth continuing this rant. Just do yourself a favor, don't bother watching it and save your braincells for something decent.
Music and Meditation Series there.
Five years is a long time for mojo to go on vacation, but it is what it is.
Mia wants to trust the enigmatic and alluring Jeremy when he promises to protect her, but she fears he isn't who he claims to be. In the end, the passion and power that brought them together could be their downfall. When the final disaster strikes, Mia must risk unleashing the full horror of her strength to save the people she loves, or lose everything.
Ok. We all get that, kinda. We understand. But how are you really supposed to be going about it? As ‘salt of the Earth’, does it really fit that you impose your views on a secular society? So you disagree with gay marriage; that great threat to marriages everywhere! Somehow, it will destroy the institution of marriage and according to some, subvert freedom. The Day of Silence movement, where kids are being encouraged to walk out of schools across America to protest (silently) the anti-gay bias and bullying, is being promoted as some kind of ultra-liberal left-wing plot to encourage homosexuality in our children. I really have to.. /headpalm. Why everything is a national plot by the left-leaning commies. Our good friend Allen West, in Florida of all places, used McCarthy-like rhetoric to label at least 80 democrats in Congress as Communists. Nevermind that he probably doesn’t even know what Communism is, this is just pure vitriolic pablum and baseless ad hominum. Oh, and it’s dangerous. And let’s not forget the ‘Climate Change Controversy’ – ugh, really? Just do whatever the hell you want to the Earth, ‘..God is still up there’ and ‘..The arrogance of people to think that we, human beings, would be able to change what He is doing in the climate is to me outrageous (James Inhofe).’. Yeah, that’s outrageous alright.
Ex-boyfriends always change when you see them and put on the show that convinces you that they’ve changed.
We have a month until we have to move out of our house now (and into a townhouse temporarily until our house is complete). This impending move has been feeling irritable, anxious, and distracted. So, a little apology in advance if I seem to be in a perpetual bad mood this month! Disarray doesn't agree with me and I know this is all temporary, but it doesn't make it any easier for me!
However, it is not only the state of neighborhood parks that has contributed to rampant drug use in public spaces in the Whiteaker but also shortage of holding facilities for people who live on the street.
The current chair of the Campaign For Real Kevins decided to use his platform at the recent Kevin AGM to label beer bloggers a 'threat', as if by our sometimes inane scribblings, we might create a favourable climate for the Rise Of Keg and undo 40 years of Kevin activism.
Stamps: Laura Flower Girl (Elphine House Australia)
Let’s walk through backing up both the public and private key for your key pair. This is useful so that you can restore your keys if you have to completely reformat your system, if you lose your primary computer (say lose a laptop on a business trip), or a catastrophic data loss event occurs…. like you delete your key by accident and find out your standard OS backups are bad.
Not gonna lie, I purchased the Becca Resurfacing Primer after seeing Suze rave about how great it is for sweaty bitches, aka me. It has a different texture to the other primers I've tried, almost like a thick ointment with very little slip that takes a while to rub in.
Glue- glue stick, tacky, mod podge, mat medium all work.
In May 2001 we found out that Buster needed surgery. It was sort of a shock, since he had never been sick a day in his life, but now he had a big fatty tumor, non-malignant, growing inside his abdominal cavity. We had a lot of faith in his vet, Dr. Faulkner, at American River Animal Hospital, and Buster trusted her too.
One thing that left a positive impression on me was that the parents of the boys were encouraging and nurturing towards their children's interest in art. May the children continue to be encouraged to nurture their natural interests and talents.
to say he is a hard worker is an understatement.
A quote that I found interesting was that “perceptions become key to reality”. I found this interesting because the way we perceive different things ultimately leads to a new or revised way to how we view, think or feel or chose to act. The fact that this concept was presented as in art form just lets me know that individuality and the want and need to break from social restraints are very much real.
Ratchet and Clank 3 (PS2)
Coming up next: the Brooklyn Bridge, 9/11 Memorial, and Top of the Rock.
--Thomas D. Haiburton
Self: “SHE WASN’T BORN. Or else she would’ve been there.”
BTW... there's LOTS of chances to WIN FREE DIGIS at Doodle Pantry! They have bi-weekly challenges on their Blog (5th and the 20th) in which one player will get a $20 Gift Certificate to the DP store, and 3 will win one FREE digi of their choice along with a "Top 3" badge for your blog (only allowed one entry per challenge), and then they also have a monthly challenge in their CDAC forum where 2 or 3 winners will win a FREE DIGI of their choice... all you have to do is upload your DP creations (one allowed per week) and winners will be picked at the end of the month =)
Lord, every commitment involves sacrifice and, sometimes, pain. May we bear the trials of our commitments with patience, realising that you reward us for our fidelity in your own time. Amen.
Hop over to Jean's blog ( Bear Hugs and Inky Paws) and see what she had posted.
27. Mockingjay Suzanne Collins
celebrating its own downfall.
conversation you don't yet understand,
Let's shake it up a bit. Let's learn a new language, discover some new foods, wines, and find some new neighbors (Could be you. Scared?) to impose our by now extremely quirky 'Scandinavian' on (that's a nice way of saying I will always belt out the chorus to Yö's Ihmisen Poika [best song ever and perhaps the best band too] loudly in the shower when you least expect it [I take showers at odd hours apparently], and the Viking will look at you funny when you ask him to ask his wife to stop singing in the apartment before inviting you in to taste the world's best mustard [which is of Finnish origin, naturally!]).
Tools: Sharp Crochet Hook and Crochet Edging Handbook
When ammonia and nitrate are both present, LD50 occurs when the the concentrate of ammonia is .5mg/L and nitrate is 30mg/L at the same time.
Read-Again Ratio: B (2.5 points)
When O’Faolain found out in early 2008 just how little time she had left she commented that she felt as though all the good had been taken out of life – a brave statement to make public – but a controversial one. She undertook a radio interview that explored how she felt about dying; one that proved to open many doors into this most private of experiences. O’Faolain decided to make the most of her final weeks and rather than fight a battle that could not be won, she wanted to enjoy what she could. Chase makes the same commitment through her work but refers back in other poems to previous experiences of another’s death, which seems to have helped prepared her for what is to come. ‘Dying’, or death is someone known, if not a friend, in this haunting first line from the same titled poem: “Dying wakes you up quietly, wafting / into your nostrils...”
He also blamed the organisers’ failure to control the crowd which paved way for the ensuing chaos and violence.
I next stopped off to buy some organic barley flour to make my Matzo, there are strict guidelines for making matzo as all bread eaten needs to be unleavened. Different Jewish cultures have different ways of making their matzo, some in a frying pan/griddle and some in the oven. I’m no expert at all, all I care about is getting it all done within the allowed time frame. I also bought ready-made matzo just in case.
were the two leading practitioners of magic. Thurston specialized in
EMP Vulnerability of the Automobile and Trucking Infrastructures
but I still plan on enjoying some relaxing time and maybe even starting a new book to read!
dreams within dreams
As a child I put my hope in my father. He was an amazing Dad who supplied everything his wife and six daughters needed. There was never a day I went hungry and there was rarely a day he didn't make me smile. He was everything to me.
But I was also intrigued by a conversation I had with a dear friend who came out to me as a gay man after years of friendship. In our following conversations, he talked about the homophobia he carried with him and this really surprised me. It sounds silly to say now, but I had never thought about prejudices we are taught and hang on to, even when we are the objects of that prejudice. Watersmeet is not about homophobia, but it does explore the question of letting go of one’s prejudice, even when one has been deeply injured by that prejudice.
Vive le Paris.
Someone once told me not to become a literary agent if I was one of those people who had to always 'clear my desk.' The simple fact is that there will always be jobs on my to do list. There will always be submissions to read. There will always be client manuscripts to edit. And there will always be another blog post/tweet/social media thing to do!
But it was fun and it's good to think you can communicate with people around the world all at once.
I don't discipline* my kids because I see their behaviors as developmental stages, just like the ones along the way to walking. I remember that each child learns to walk at his own pace, when all the developmental pieces are in place for him. I remember that pushing a child to learn to walk is both futile and unnecessary. This is why I don't push my kids to behave in certain ways, when they are clearly not ready. We talk about our actions and how they affect other people. But I don't expect the kids to fully grasp these things, until they do.
The 80's gave us Prince and Boy George, but thankfully that little ol' band from Texas was able to kick their ass, along with a blaze of blues known as Stevie Ray Vaughn. But both Texas legends were throwbacks to an earlier era with ZZ Top being a solidly 70's originating band, while Boy George was a throwback to, to. . . to what, I'm not sure. A failed sex-experiment somewhere in Sweden with a couple of transgenders on LSD?
To be clear the classic Anglican approach is Scripture, Tradition, and Reason and is colloquially known as Hooker's Three Legged Stool. In reality, Hooker never used the term "three legged stool" and if his works are read attentively, it would be apparent that the "legs" are not of equal length.
“Everyone was amazed and gave praise to God. They were filled with awe and said, “We have seen remarkable things today.”
Cheers, readers!
What can we infer from it?
*Source: Overview of Findings from the 2006 National Survey on Drug Use and Health
—The K¹² Online Expo Team
Prosperity and peace introduced the distinction of the vulgar and the Ascetic Christians. The loose and imperfect practice of religion satisfied the conscience of the multitude. The prince or magistrate, the soldier or merchant, reconciled their fervent zeal and implicit faith with the exercise of their profession, the pursuit of their interest, and the indulgence of their passions but the Ascetics, who obeyed and abused the rigid precepts of the Gospel, were inspired by the savage enthusiasm which represents man as a criminal, and God as a tyrant.
The Starting with the decision "Überwachungsvorrichtung" in 2009, the 10th senate of the German Bundespatentgericht and the BGH have develpoed a theory allowing for a re-establishment of rights even after expiry of the one-year term. The most spectacular decision "Crimpwerkzeug III" ( ZR 193/03) reported here and available (in German) here, the BGH granted re-instatement into the delay for filing new grounds of an appeal against the decision of an upper distruct court not to admit revision to the BGH because the new grounds related to contradictory claim interpretations in judgements, wherein the (binding) interpretation of the BGH was available only after the expiry of the delay.
The only reason to complain would be if Jerry were NOT offensive.
Fermentation ~ “A Good Thing!”
Gently brush with egg wash and drizzle mayonnaise over the roll (if you wish). I didn't use any mayonnaise as I do not like it. Return to the baking tray and cover with the cling wrap and wet towel. Proof in the slightly warm oven for 20 minutes.
So, I’ve got this closet that has been collecting boxes over the years. It seems that this is a phenomenon as common as the junk drawer in that almost everyone has one. It usually starts out with a single box that we don’t know what to do with and before we know it the thing becomes the epicenter for all the crap we have no idea how to deal with.
SS: We have so much trouble with titles.
One games-industry source suggested that Microsoft would implement an “anti-used-games system,” such as linking copies of new games to the console. Theoretically, the owner of the console could just play games offline in order to cheat the system.
From the authors of Four Paws from Heaven (over 100,000 copies sold) comes a new collection of devotional tales. In these heartwarming stories, the authors share wisdom gleaned from years of training, guiding, and loving the canines in their lives. Readers will discover powerful spiritual insights, including:
Add the flours and beat until smooth.
Neighbors
Coastal Florida
47. Women burn fat more slowly than men, by a rate of about 50 calories a day. Most men have a much easier time burning fat than women. Women, because of their reproductive role, generally require a higher basic body fat proportion than men, and as a result their bodies don’t get rid of excess fat at the same rate as men.
What else... we are giving acid reflux medicine a try too. All along Allie's had issues with her tummy. I did an elimination diet way back in Sept/Oct and we identified various foods that gave Allie what we've called "painful gas". So currently no gluten or dairy for me, and some other random foods. I even started eating chicken again after being pescatarian (I ate fish) for 11 years. But last week in particular, we had some rough nights and the cries I heard Allie waking up with were cries of pain. From what - I don't know. Her tummy? Is she teething? Who knows. So we're trying the acid reflux med to rule that out (or in). It's only the first full day (and she spits out so much of the liquid), so we'll give it a week and see if that changes her ability to sleep longer stretches.
The following week it's off to the Port of Miami, where I'll be walking down the aisle of a cruise ship in a pretty blue bridesmaids dress, helping celebrate a dear friend's wedding! We'll be cruising to Mexico for some fun in the sun aboard the Celebrity Millenium.
Random actions
The computer can tell you that those are strings with x characters.
The kicker though was last night when I took a break from logo designing and went to use the bathroom. In said bathroom there were only two urinals. I was at one and then a couple seconds later another guy came in occupying the other, and a few seconds later... I got a text.
This one is hard for me. By mile 4 or 5 on this course, it was very apparent that the heat was getting to me. I had stopped sweating, my head was hot but my body was freezing, and breathing was incredible labored. I have mentioned before that my Irish blood runs thick, and it can take me a bit of time to acclimatize to the heat every summer. The Nashville race was hot. Seriously hot. I think it ended up being in the low 70s, which doesn’t seem hot when I read it, but with the baking asphalt and lack of shade, was hot enough to make my body extremely uncomfortable. I drank at every station and also doused my head and neck with water to cool me down. The heat was worrisome enough to me that it made me consider whether this would be my first DNF. The lack of visible medical volunteers on the course and the frequent walking breaks I took during the second half of the race were the only things that kept me going.
For the cheaper stuff, consider using the honor system: "I'll leave the lamp by my front door. If you decide to take it, please leave $5 under the mat." That way you don't have to wait around and schedule times, and if someone steals it, big freakin' deal.
my english story becomes more interesting when it involves competition. i am saying about, my eagerness to compete with a colleague who spoke eloquently in english! all i do is read, read and read his writings :) yeah, that was a long time ago, and now it is revealed :) adeh. but i've never agree with his points of view of life, i just take the assets not the liabilities with me~ whenever i see he has improved, i tried my best to improve my skills. hehh. he is good at public speaking, thanks to him that i start to do my public speaking since form 3, in the same camp that both of us joined coincidently together. while other people admire him for his personality - the face whatsoever - i admire his confidence and courage to face the public - but still like i've said before, i've never agree with his points of view of life =.=
Some of the biggest Wind Farms are located around Sweetwater Texas
As snow reports were showing the snow line approaching I felt it best to get out there this morning. It was dull and overcast when I set off; not very promising at all. As soon as I turned the corner though I realised just how windy it was. A strong and cold north wind was coming straight down the country…straight at me! I’d opted to reverse a route I enjoy to give a try at approaching some of the hills from the other side, just for a change. I’m pleased now that this is how I ran it because although I had the wind on my face early on, it was on my back coming home. There’s nothing worse than running into the wind when you’re tired.
But who doesn’t like Sean Connery?
Paul Cole has circulated members of the Patent Agent Litigator's Group encouraging us to argue against the cap. We do not need one. He points out that the IPO has no cap in its patent infringement jurisdiction under section 61(3) of the Patents Act 1977. However that jurisdiction is pretty moribund as both parties need to agree on going to the IPO. The IPO does not deal in trademark infringement at all.
I'm a sucker for anything "mini" and ruffle cakes are one of my new favorite things to make. This weekend I decided why not combine the two?
and staying-up-all-nightings
But that doesn't meant that I don't still need to vent.
235500 Carpentry & floor contractors
He yawns, one of those horrible, big yawns. I start yawning too. He giggles. I giggle.
Haunting Baker Street
Keeping
I am privileged to pull up here Julian's comment on my posts on the subject, a fascinating description of his response to the radio adaptation process:
While I expected thrilling action, I was pleasantly surprised at just how funny The Avengers was. Iron Man/Tony Stark has a notorious sense of humor, but I did not expect as many laugh out moments. I especially did not expect the biggest laugh line to go to Thor. The humor added another dimension to the film and made it all the more enjoyable. The Avengers is definitely a good time.
More tiny frogs got tired and gave up...But ONE continued higher and higher and higher... This one wouldn’t give up! At the end everyone else had given up climbing the tower. Except for the one tiny frog who after a big effort was the only one who reached the top!
Coconut flour, for dusting
Sakthi Sugars
I also want to say that I’m not trying to say that I share my opinion all the time and that I go around calling people bad names and I get away with it because I can justify my opinion. Because, belive it or not, I don’t. There are consiquences for things like calling people names even if it IS true. Sure we have right of speech, but there is still a little thing called manners. We all know them, but don’t always remember to use them.
In fancy they pursue
Environmental problems 5.0 Average
*You like to be swaddled at night.
And so they gathered there to remember and honour the dead,
His eyes are closed, his face is pale, he dares not look on the
Manchester City 1-1 Manchester United
Happy Monday, Sugar lovers! Pat Frank here with another new Sugar Nellie card! This one is a commission card for a friend's 16 year-old daughter...she requested ORANGE! Hmmmm...a tough one for me, because I'm not an orange person! Well, except I like oranges to eat...they're delicious! hehe! But the color orange, not so much! So, here's what I came up with...hope she likes it!
FREE STAMP!
his fury.
We’ve come almost 1,700 miles since leaving Silver city – averaging around 330-350 miles a day. That means an average driving time each day of around 4 to 4-1/2 hours – a long time for a leggy poodle to spend “resting” in the back of Tumbleweed! So, with stops for play at places like a fenced cemetery, a fenced grassy entranceway to a baseball stadium in Little Rock, and an honest-to-God dog park in Memphis, we’ve been traveling anywhere from 5-6 hours each day.
- Car Seat Mode:
Developing shibumi is a slow process for the westerner. It is taught in the east early in childhood. You cannot fake it; it must come naturally from years of training. It is a combination of intense physical, mental and spiritual training and you must consciously practice shibumi every day. Learn to avoid the kinds of behavior that make you foolish and be a man or women of substance. Do not only look good on the outside; it is the inside that counts (do not only be a model). Face reality and do not deny everything. Know your limitations as well as your potential (realistically). Do not make excuses, do not fake it if you do not know it. Act your age, do not be someone you are not.
Here is a description of Yoga at Moses:
Besides being kind and respectful and all that, he must also have spanko tendencies, a dirty side, a dirty mouth, a firm hand, control without being abusive... all of these extremely picky things regarding bedroom romping, and who can be this perfect person?
I don’t know what this would be called. I like to think of it as a sweet chutney because of my Indian food background, but I guess it would be closer to a warm fruit spread. I welcome proper classification from a foodie know-it-all.
JW: I remember we moved during the middle of sixth grade. One of my teachers that year in Bensalem, PA., asked the class to write down their favorite group. Three Dog Night won, closely followed by Sly & The Family Stone. I was a little puzzled by that result, having written down The Rolling Stones.
RSPCA officers found the couple’s nine-month-old baby in a bed with sheets soiled with bird droppings, magistrates heard.
Then they rode back, but not
We’re the internet dispute organization authorized by the government,which mainly deal with international company's in Asia. We have something important need to confirm with your company.
Somebody forgot
Despite rumors and speculation that one or more of the candidates excluded from Egypt's election campaign over the weekend would be reinstated on appeal, the Elections Committee has reaffirmed the ban on all ten, including the "big three" of Khairat al-Shater Hazem Abu Isma‘il, and ‘Omar Suleiman.
03 Residual expectation
I am so thankful for Chad's parents and the wonderful example they were to Chad growing up, because I know that is part of the reason I have such an amazing person to call mine.
Mistake #3. The cops, almost immediately after MACC passed the baton to them(saying this was not a graft issue), stated that preliminary investigations showed there was no element of Criminal Breach of Trust.
With a round brick granary and a big red barn,
Are in his eyes, and in his ears
But onanism of the mind is perhaps the cardinal vice of the guardians of truth and love, the liberals, and their even more truthful and loving offspring, the “progressives.” Of course, there are missing-cogs Neo-Nazi cuckoo clocks too, and there are the monomaniacal Elders of Zion minipundits and the Senders-of-the-blacks to “back where they came from” (involuntarily and 200 years before the ancestors of their would-be expellers). But these hide in the swamps of Idaho and in low-membership chatrooms.
So yesterday after running errands I decided to tackle power washing. 1) I learned that my house is WAY dirty and it will probably have to be scrubbed with something and blasted again, but I will wait for someone with a really tall ladder to do that 2) I learned that the mother of all spiders was living in the corner of my half wrap porch and was about half the size of my hand. Dear God I am terrified of spiders. Seriously. But back to the story.
Commandant, U.S. Coast Guard (‘98-‘02)
Within two hours, the trusty bus from Skydive Hawaii picked me up at my hotel. After making sure my seat belt was securely fastened, we were off to pick up my fellow skydivers.
A lot of us miss the “Harry Potter” books and films, now that the series is complete. Some of us choose to re-read and re-watch. Some of us have moved onto the “Hunger Games” series. Some of us weep into our butter beer. Others … well, they write erotic fan fiction starring Voldemort to deal with the pain.
Broccoli and Ham Quiche: USE ATLEAST 3 DIFFERENT Manufacturers
While the Steve was walking down the hall, keeping the numbers in his memory, another staff member would “coincidentally” appear in the hallway holding a tray of dessert. This staff member said to Steve, “Oh, you’re participating in our study? Thank you so much! You know we just ended a big meeting and have all of these leftover snacks. Can I offer you some fruit or a piece of cake?” Professor Shiv then compiled the choices of each participant. Who chose the fruit? Who chose the cake?
My wedding is going to be at a venue that you have to find the location for the ceremony & reception, so I neeed to send maps to help them get to where they needed to be. Whereas maps were printed by the Chicago Botanic Garden for visitors, they wouldn’t be easily used by wedding guests trying to find a ceremony & reception.
It was being teased by a friend the other day for my pronunciation of the word Donkey that brought all this to mind. I pronounce it to rhyme with monkey – Dunk –ee. I found the song Delaney’s Donkey on You tube and was delighted to find that the pronounciation on this is the same. So it's not just Tipperary people that say it that way. I loved this song as a child – especially after my own experiences with Neddy the donkey. I think you might enjoy it too.
The festival is made up of all sorts of contests. The prize for each is a potion of vitality. The first contest is a deity trivia game. Poppy wins the contest by answering knowing the god of magic – Ioun, and the goddess of the dead, the Raven Queen. The next contest is a 100 furlong footrace. Thokk makes an excellent showing, but is out paced by one of the Worgen brothers. Next comes the barrel jumping contest.
Don’t confuse this with yesterday’s feature of Reclaiming the Ruins, today’s band is simply called “Ruin“! From Cleveland, Ohio, this band is composed of Chris Schott, Jim Greenfeather, Jesse Greenfeather, Nick Cox, and Tim Parker Shaffer! Jesse took a break to do an interview with us!
Some 45 years later, in Joshua 14 verse 8, Caleb, referring back to the previous generation who died in the wilderness, said, “Because my brethren (the other ten spies who came back), brought this negative word back, and their words robbed the people of their courage and caused their hearts to melt.”
All our guests dressed them in traditional costumes, to feel a real man from Maramures with Burn and cook, as I port from us.
Cape Town Club Accuses Police of Brutality
2) Get back on a schedule - School starts again this week so that means I am back to work for the school year. Summer is great for a lot of reasons (warm weather activities, fresh produce, a carefree attitude) but being on a schedule is not one of them. I'm a bit of a control freak, so the school year is good for me because I can plan more regular meals and exercise since I am on a set schedule. Sometimes, this throws me off right at the beginning of the school year since it's hard to figure out how I ever had time to work, exercise, cook, clean, etc (I've often fallen victim to ordering a lot of pizza during the first couple weeks of school). I'm spoiled in the summer and can use all my time to care for myself and my home! It's a lot harder when I suddenly have to convert back to the working woman! My goal this year is to not let the transition phase me and to keep up my recent success!
It’s easy to say. But the most difficult thing with my periods of ill-health (and other adversities,) is finding the strength to believe in myself again.
I found this book to be really interesting, and I learned a few new tricks from it. I also realized that I have a lot, yet, left to learn! LOL.
No matter how you feel about our government and foreign policy, the armed forces have been a lifesaver for countless young people. The GI Bill sent a whole generation to college. For others, the Army was hell on earth. So it’s not for everyone. Opinions in the autism community seem sharply polarized.
In World of Dungeoneer Quests give you Quest Points. These Quest points required are the level you gain for your completed Quests. For example level 2 only requires 2 Quest points, while to go from 2 to 3 requires 3 Quest points. This greatly evens the game out between level 1 and level 2 characters. Also harder Quests can give more Quest points, while easy Quests only give 1 point.
And I also made this mini 6-inch ice-cream cake for my friend Diana last February. It was a chocolate cake again, but I can't remember what ice-cream flavor I made. I think it was my plain coffee ice-cream?
After witnessing Iason getting out of his vehicle and entering a rather secretive looking door, Riki does the same. His chase leads him to this aquatic-like room where he winds up being pursued by a mermaid (?) with a grudge.
We had freedom, failure, success and responsibility, and that's how we learned to deal with life.
The whole situation was ridiculous. She did not dare for one moment believe what he said about what he left, perhaps since that moment 6 months ago. She thought that there must be some moments where he was really true to his feelings, that he let a glimpse on what he felt out. But she had seen enough to know even those could be engineered. A chuckle started, rolling into a deep hearty laugh at how ridiculous the situation was, on how he indicated that she was never the one giving herself to this.
The world's most renowned population analyst has called for a massive reduction in the number of humans and for natural resources to be redistributed from the rich to the poor.
In my heart I feel you everyday and I know you are going to watch over your little sister and that means the world to me. I am going to tell her what a wonderful and special big sister she has and how lucky she and how I wish she could have met you baby I am so sorry, I am so so sorry for what as happened to you. I LOVE YOU WITH ALL THAT I AM AND ALL THAT I WILL BE LOVE MOMMY
I've used 'Meant to be' from the new release from Lili Of The Valley, and I've coloured it in with distress inks. I've attempted clouds, for the first time-I'm not sure if they're too subtle. I'm entering this into Lili's Little Fairies challenge, were the theme this week is 'Ribbons and Bows'. I'm also entering it into Crafting Lifes Pieces 'Sketch #46'.
Mr Galloway recently married again for the fourth time (although his third wife claims they are still married). I wish the bride and groom every happiness. I wonder, though: did they spend their honeymoon in Iran?
Stamps: Every Moment, Teeny Tiny Wishes
In his review of the film, Slant Magazine's Ed Gonzalez suggests some ways in which The Ghost Writer ties into Polanski's own personal traumas:
Absolut Raspberri – 40%
and guitarist Bob Weir were featured at the mixing console,
The phrase “we take care of our own” is associated with American patriotism. On the same caliber of “united we stand,” this phrase is one that many American’s hold dear proudly hold to be true. Hmm, maybe Gingrich will use this as him campaign anthem. On second thought, he might want to listen to the lyrics more closely.
In modern day Britain, telling the truth is no defence against hate crime charges.
This is the house right in front of mine, and that is their classic Volkswagen bug, and it looks like new and they don’t like to drive it outside much, but when they do, I watch the car pull out of their driveway while a single manly tear runs down my face.
Write 500 words - halfish check
Work in progress. Little improvements here, set backs there...
German regalia and celebrates some German festivals as a tourist drawing card. Winter time just after Christmas, is a good time to enjoy the town’s festive lights, German restaurant fare and its Nutcracker Museum –which was closed on the day we were there.
HISTER BEETLE (above right)
With both historical and contemporary fiction I go for what I suppose is the literary end of the market and what could be described as 'intelligent women's fiction'. I'm not a huge fan of crime fiction, although I read some. I don't like sadism or cruelty to children but I don't like crime when it resembles Cluedo. I do not enjoy science fiction or fantasy. But that still leaves hundreds and hundreds to choose from.
I had alot of fun experimenting with my new piece of equipment - the Silhouette digital cutting machine which was used for all the text on all four cards.
it was likely she saw only my flailing legs and skirt.
I embellished the front of the bag and then used a Large Manila Tag to journal the story. All of my Kraft colored patterned papers are from My Mind's Eye. For the metal clip, I used a small silver clip, removing on of the clips and then smashing down the metal parts with my hammer. This way the clip lays more flat in my album.
Now I am ready to start sharing some of the pictures of what we have been up to on the Disney Pictures and lots of Disney Pictures to share!!
I teach online book-writing classes and week-long book-writing retreats. In both of these courses, there's the keen possibility of getting stuck. I watch many writers reach this place, and although they despair, I am quietly celebrating. It doesn't mean I am a nasty person who likes to watch people suffer. I just delight in the knowledge that this "stuck" writer is about to breakthrough to a new level, because I deeply believe that getting stuck--even for an hour--is a prerequisite to that letting go that allows the breakthrough to happen.
“It was good to see you up close again, old man.” The sound of his voice wavers against the other noise filling these streets. By concentrating some more, I hear him more clearly. “That reporter’s disguise of yours isn’t entirely a disguise anymore, is it? The skintight suit isn’t quite as flattering as it used to be, and there are a couple of wrinkles that weren’t there before. You’re not running as hot as you used to, are you?”
And the heatened chambers, even in darkness
Heavy (Atco/Atlantic)
Ishak M.
So, first things first: Frances “Baby” Houseman. I’m going on record here to say that if Lea Michele gets this part I will carry a watermelon all the way to her house, set it on fire, and lob it over the electrified fence. Ditto Kristen Stewart. The only acceptable Baby is someone who has more expressions in her arsenal than “facial jazz hands” or “sullen nostril-flaring.” A non-traditional beauty like Jennifer Grey would be nice, but we all know that if Jennifer Grey started her career today with her original nose, the best she could hope for is a walk-on as one of Blair Waldorf’s minions in Gossip Girl. So I’ll be realistic and accept that they’re going to want someone sexier. The most obvious Jews are Natalie Portman, Mila Kunis and Rachel Bilson (P.S. I had to Google “young hot Jewish actress” for research, which I’m sure puts me on some government watch list), but they’re all too cutesy. Baby needs to be convincingly awkward. Which is why I nominate…
I take a dutiful look around. A dollar for this, a dollar for that....and see the 3 leather jackets hanging there.
It is two years, nearly to the day, to the start of the London Paralympics. I can’t wait to get tickets for that.
I think that's going to mean a fabric purchase as I only have scraps in these colors.
Government sources, however, said the Lib Dems are objecting to the plan. The party is said to have expressed concern that the system would tar some children permanently by associating them with undesirable fathers, as well as undermining the rights of new mothers to make their own decisions about whether or not to acknowledge paternity.
Its my first time here and it is pretty… but it’s not the weather you would have at the Florida or Alabama beaches. I guess I am further north. I just had no idea how COLD it would be. What good is a beach hotel when the high is 62 degrees!!!
My marriage was only a few months old, Vus was still an enigma I hadn't solved and the mystery was sexually titillating. I was in love. Guy's grades had improved but he was seldom home. When I offered to invite the parents of his new friends over for dinner, he laughed at me. (p. 178).Not so sure how those sentences mesh together either... Personally, I would like never to see the words "titillating" and "grades" in this kind of proximity.
08/18/09 BUY USDJPY 0.01 95.00
But wait for it….here comes the Newscorp line: Goldman Sachs has “fully cooperated” with federal authorities for more than two years on this and 40 other cases, a GS spokesman averred six days ago.
Occasionally we spot each other in the street
I inherited from my father a love of interesting and eccentric games – and several of the books he owned on the subject. My favorite was a thick paperback by renowned card games scholar David Parlett, which must have had hundreds of games and thousands of variants all organized into families. I can’t find that particular book at the moment, (though I remember flipping through it within the past several months,) or remember the title – though I remember that it has an Ace of Spades design on the cover.
All of which, being perverse as I am, made me wanna dig it!
Some will notice that G.J. Koch looks like Gini Koch, of the Alien/Katherine “Kitty” Katt series from DAW Books. They are one in the same. For fans of that series, she offers, "the Alexander Outland series is actually funnier than the Alien series. There’s a focus on romance in both series, but the Outland series has no graphic sex at all, and the Alien series does. They’re different enough that it made sense to write and publish under another pen name, and Night Shade agreed."
Unfortunately, the backs do not feature the '75 backs we all know and love. And the cards are made from that same slick crap that has plagued the Topps base set for the last decade. But I appreciate the thought by Topps and am trying to collect as many as I can. I owe it to my 9-year-old self.
The opposition to CAIR is not rooted in bigotry. A 2007 federal filing states, “From its founding by Muslim Brotherhood leaders, CAIR conspired with other affiliates of the Muslim Brotherhood to support terrorists.” It says “the conspirators used deception to conceal from the American public their connections to terrorists.”…
Heading out in a few to the big Camping World store. We have only been to an express store before so this will be a fun adventure.
I am so glad that there are people out there that makes books for kids with a not to average family life. Baby J doesn’t know she is any different from anyone else. She nows she has two mommies and she is very happy with that. She know how much we love her and I pray that she will be a very well-adjusted child as she grows up and gets exposed to the rest of the cruel world. But for now we are enjoying these great books.
What follows is from a message that I shared this past Monday evening with a men’s ministry from another church. It was a real blessing to be with them and I’m grateful both to them and to God for the opportunity.
3 Bring It On Home Intro/Black Dog
"Ms. Sassy" and I have a little holiday tradition to get together for a nice meal before everyone heads their separate ways to family gatherings (the calm before the storm of frenzied feeding - might as well abandon all restraint until the new year). This time we decided to take our year-end round-up to Drago Centro, with her $50 group buy deal in hand.
First, preheat your oven to 325 degrees.
Alright, enough of the mushy stuff…
I don’t have any pictures of my Mum reading, but here she is (second row, first right) in her primary School classroom in the 1920s. Reading doesn’t look nearly as much fun in this formally posed picture, but my Mum, now aged 90, assures me that it was. She first heard her favourite, The Wind in the Willows, read aloud by her teacher, in chapters at the end of the day, instilling in Mum a lifelong love of good stories. Mum is an avid reader of fiction and poetry to this day, and reads far faster than I ever can. I asked her what her other stories she enjoyed when she was a youngster. 'Martin Rattler, the Adventures of a Boy in the Forests of Brazil', by R.M. Ballantyne, was top of the list and she loved the Grimms and Hans Christian Anderson stories, which she would read by the light of a Tilley Lamp in bed.
The darts sat weirdly so I had to change their positioning and take them in, as well as take in the side seams, and finish the seams and the facings. The fit isn't perfect but I have made peace with it.
Wow what a week we have had. I feel like we actually were able to accomplish everything I set out to do. That does not happen very often around here.
Lundi, c'est aussi l'heure de Cupcake, le challenge proposé par l'équipe A est "Des Pois"! Et maintenant à vos fées, en espérant que vous pourrez participer au premier challenge des Sweet Stamping Pixies! Vous avez jusqu'au 6 avril! Bonne journée et merci de votre visite, je ne vous dis même pas comme je suis loin dans mes coms, mais je crois que vous le savez... Bisous,
1 1/2 C ketchup (you heard me!)
Isa 63:9: In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and he bare them, and carried them all the days of old. 10 But they rebelled, and vexed his holy Spirit: therefore he was turned to be their enemy, and he fought against them.
Furniture in the style of treble and bass clefs, and...
Lockdown is non stop action. Both Alex and the reader never pause for breath. One minute, it's arrival in Furnace; next is scrambling for the cell as sirens ring and dogs are let out; then there is the terrifying moments when "they" come, in the night, to take people away. Turn the page (or in my case, listen for one minute more) to find out what happens next, what Alex does next, whether Alex can figure a way out. Because while everyone says escape is impossible, Alex doesn't care what everyone says.
In this unforgiving prison
By T-7 hours (8pm) everything sat in a neat pile beside the front door. Except the bathroom bag.
Chief Brody’s famous line “You’re gonna need a bigger boat….” was improvised by Roy Scheider.
They are the best neighbors and given she is gone for a week-we are having her husband over for dinner on Tuesday night.
We shared our heartaches and our triumphs as fathers, husbands and human beings.
Urad dal : 1/4 cup
That’s Just Not True.
Woman has much reason for shame; so much pedantry, superficiality, schoolmarmishness, petty presumption, petty licentiousness and immodesty lies concealed in woman.[23]
I’m very annoyed at this point and I’m waiting for him to get to the news about my roof, as this is the reason for my call. He starts to talk about my chimney cap again. “Look, those are custom chimney caps, and they don’t make them anymore, so I put some (insert word) around it, but you may have a leak around that as well.”Yea, well, I’m not worried about it.Besides, if they’re custom made, that means, they’ll custom make one, if I need it.” “No they won’t.” Now the guy start’s arguing with me! What in the world? Does he know they? Does he know Tony?
I put some pussy on lay-away.
Stitch all the way around your crayon pocket holder leaving an approximate 3" opening at the bottom edge to turn it rightside out. Finish your seam lines and I suggest reinforcing the corners with a couple of stitches in the corners.
Bringing to you dishes from a wide array of local traditions, from the North and the Po Valley to Sicily and Sardinia, we stand by our belief that recipes that have stood the test of time, refined by the palates of many generations, are worth respecting and renewing. Sourcing our ingredients from quality, highly regarded Italian producers and distributors, Rossella now gives you the opportunity to experience the pleasure of eating in London’s metropolitan heart.
Then, things happened and eventually our situation was brought to court. We had joint custody and it was horrible to leave Little One with him and then he tried to gain custody and get out of child support. He eventually said he didn't want to pay so I can just have custody. Wow. To hear that he doesn't even want anything to do with Little One or me was just so painful but I was glad because now we could move on and I haven't been happier since.
Because everyone knows that the absolute BEST way to improve a movie isn't about the script, acting or directing, it's how much CRAZY CGI stuff you can totally unnecessarily cram into the background of Every. Single. Scene. of your films.
One of my favorite things about my kids, and what makes unschooling easy with them, is that they're not cynical or critical about the interests of others in the family, or of the neighbors, or of their friends. They assume that everything has the potential to be interesting and good.
In solidarity.
With intricate designs.
things you like to do…
Release, vent and breathe in some air;
beyond
After breakfast, the Satan Ana winds magically died off. (YAY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!) We all de-sooted ourselves in the restrooms, and then trekked over to New Orleans Square because Wednesday really, REALLY wanted to show the other kids in our group the Jack Skellington makeover over at the Haunted Mansion.
6. After opening the cooker, just give a gentle mash with a ladle/spoon and check for the salt.
More hard cheese to grate on top
It was a tough blow to take and I got pretty angry, scared and emotionally beat down. Still, my doc remained convinced that in my case, I could manage without daily meds and insulin shots and that I could get a handle on this through simple diet and exercise. And she was right.
Marketing can be a real balancing act for sure. Plan your act carefully. Practice the tricks you'll be using and then when you're ready you can hit the stage and perform before a real audience. One thing you don't want to do when you're in the spotlight is drop the balls, but if you do just pick them up and act as though it's part of the act.
It's a crying shame.
Professor RD Charon
There are no self introductions in college, only the mutual awkwardness shared by a large group of strangers, hoping that you won't get paired up with that "one guy" for the group project. You're lucky if you meet one person in your classes. I will never be able to be known as "the transfer student." At the very best, I could be "that white guy..."
This is usual Saturday with unusual arrangement- work on Saturday. I have been long time didnt work on Saturday, usually busy with activities and studies.
If you’re not sure what you would like to try at Phnom Penh, you can try out one of their special combo platters. Along with rice vermicelli and a salad, this particular combo gives you rice rolls, prawn supreme, a beef brochette, and some thick slices of meat.
7. How much of the person do you see?
15. Applied for social security disability and was approved on the first try.
Chocolate Cake Batter and Topping
Bead The Pattern Magazine - this is the submission form for Bead The Pattern Magazine, but I will say I am a bit perplexed on exactly how it works.....
Tender pulses lift me out,
It's often asked, "when is the best time to list items in my store?" The simple answer is that Google Analytics will tell you what time you have the most traffic! Knowing the best times to list will save you both time and money but most importantly increase your sales.
"PLEASE let me bring you in a bed"........
I bought a book – it was a 1961 edition of Le Morte D’Arthur, the Book of King Arthur and his Knights of the Round Table by Sir Thomas Malory/knight.
Beau's twin brother, Bobby Lewis, our Stake Young Men President Gave the Eagle Charge.
I’ve got to admit, making stock from a chicken that’s been roasted lends the stock a much richer flavour. I usually use an uncooked chicken to make stock. Well, now I know better.
The English title is Late Autumn (늦가을), sung by Cho Kyuhyun of Korean boyband Super Junior.
We go further even than this in South Africa, however.
Desert dweller, the words rang in Derrek’s head. She had called him a Dendargian, and told him they lived in a Desert. His face asked for clarification before his voice did.
I saw the lights go down and standing in front of me
TOMATOMANIA! is owned and produced by Scott Daigre, “a garden designer turned the Dale Carnegie of tomatophiles.” Join him while he tells you all about the care and feeding of great heirloom and hybrid tomato varieties…and then follow him to the Tomatomania booth and select your favorites! A dedicated home gardener, Scott shares his love of digging in the dirt through event appearances, speaking engagements, books, and videos that offer tools and tips for amateur and veteran gardeners alike. He is also a great designer and owner of Powerplant Garden Design based in Ojai. www.tomatomania.com
Laughter and chicken masala ensued. If you've never eaten Indian in a group, the only way to do it is to each order a couple of dishes, put them in the middle and indulge in their yummy heat. This occasion was no exception to that rule.
Unlike many ex–bloggers I’m not quitting simply to concentrate on facebook or twitter. Although I have a presence on the former I pretty much gave up on that over a month back and not before time. Anyone who knows me knows I’m not enamoured being amongst big crowds of people I don’t really know, trading idle remarks either in person or as part of a digital gathering, preferring instead to trade more substantial messages with actual friends online when there isn’t the opportunity to sit and have a conversation in person, in the same way that I now only comment – and will continue to comment on occasion – on particular blogs.
Horse Trials, which was expected to attract some 100,000 spectators.
like pale reminders of ourselves.
Ive been going to grief counceling. Almost four years later, but it sure is helping!
But whatever the case may be with how and why things went down as they did, the problem NOW is this – the majority of folks out there are going to look at what’s happened overnight and see that press statement as either a deliberate, offensive move on the part of the issuer, or a move made totally without class, ethics, or decency. Most people will see it as both.
Without thinking anymore
Hatty x
Hi. My name is Kerry but here online I tend to go by the Gaelic version of my name, Ciarrai. I am a woman in my mid-30's who lives on Long Island, NY, with my husband, Rob, several guitars, a Nikon D40, more yarn, beads and books than I care to admit to and a cat who has a million nicknames and quite a few theme songs. I have a B.A. in Psychology and have recently returned to college to pursue a teaching degree so that I can eventually get a job as a High School English teacher.
The Symbols
Book #29 of 2012
The anglophile in me would like to see some love dished out for Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy - if for no other reason than Gary Oldman finally getting a (much deserved) Oscar. The Artist has gotten a steady stream of good buzz from everyone I know who has seen it, but being popular among seasoned filmgoers
Still it left me a bit shook up, the idea that he was harbouring those thoughts all along. I must be giving out the wrong signals when I write. Perhaps I'm not conveying what I'm thinking clearly enough. Perhaps I am a bit of twat.
Following Mr Sheridan’s questioning regarding the offer of payment made to Ms Trolle, Mr Bird denied the suggestion that the NotW considered itself “immune from prosecution.”
1 tsp oregano
On the 1st July I will be leading my last service in the Heath and Havering Group of Churches and during the next week (hopefully by the Wednesday) will be ensconsed in the new abode.
2 gentlemen
I choose to spend 20 minutes a day with each of my children to help them improve their self-confidence! Amen!
“Other than cutting your hair. . .What else do you plan on doing?”
Let's be honest. It's not like my van is super clean.
I’m not sure when I finally accepted that he wasn’t coming back. He’d been different lately. Distracted, moody, distant. We’d always had a great relationship, or so I thought at the time, and despite the big difference in our ages, we were still brothers, and he always sort of looked out for me. Mom was so depressed she barely left her bedroom for longer than it took to microwave up a cup of tea, spread some garlic and butter on a piece of overtoasted bread, then tuck another dog-eared romance novel under her arm and disappear from our lives again with the quiet click of the door pulled shut behind her.
At this time, the best thing to do is contact your Senator and the Senate Rules Committee members (mdayton@le.utah.gov, pjones@le.utah.gov, pknudson@le.utah.gov, mmadsen@le.utah.gov, kmayne@le.utah.gov, rokerlund@le.utah.gov, screid@le.utah.gov, kvantassell@le.utah.gov). Firmly, but politely request that they support SB18 and cut the schoolyard retaliation aimed at Rep. Greenwood and release his bills.
C'est une petite ballade sans difficulté, donc pour corser un peu les choses, je fais aussi une séances par semaine sur un des tapis de la salle de muscu, qui simulent des pourcentages jusqu'à 12% et me permettent de faire une séance plus intense et de travailler les jambes. À l'origine je voulais faire ces séances aux You Yangs en utilisant le sentier qui grimpe jusqu'à Flinders Peak, mais ce chemin est fermé pour cause de rénovations, donc je dois me contenter de faire une séance d'intérieur (c'est vraiment pas de chance).
From here the man focus of the novel is Gypo, the informer. Gypo suddenly realises the full extent of his actions. He is outside society. He was dismissed from the police force, expelled from the Revolutionary Organisation and now has betrayed his friend. It would be no exaggeration to say that Gypo, through his actions, has found himself on the very margins of society.
However, they would phone through to admin and try and get me taken off the *black list*.
I learned not only how to be comfortable with my peculiarities, but to enjoy them. I learned that I could love, be strong, be myself. And be happy.
“You kids should have been around here when the Trolleys ran on Church Avenue. You couldn’t imagine the shit we used to do with the Trolleys”
well-intentioned resolutions
“It’s a really big step that the College Of Medicine was willing to say ‘This is important. This is no longer fad, and we will recognize it,’ ” said Dr. Victoria Maizes, executive director at the Arizona Center for Integrative Medicine.
The fun part is, there is so much more to that idea. The moment you get that feeling of a new idea, there's so much more to it. It can go so many ways and get so much deeper. It's an irreplaceable feeling.
1/4 teaspoon ground red pepper
I looked up at him, upside down, my head whirling.
It has finally warmed up around here. Friday is was in the 60's!! Lots of melting but still lots of snow left. I'm continuing to think about springtime ....and warm Rockport breezes.
And now we must build again
I'm thinking about the stages of grief thing again. Is it still grief when you lose something that was bad for you? Or, when you aren't really losing it, but instead, you are walking away? Just wondering. I guess I want to deny that I have to grieve this. Or, rather, I want to find out if I can just do this without the grief.
Rustie – Surph feat. Nightwave
Wednesday: Pork Roast, Mashed Potatoes, Green Beans
By Evelyn Spence of Council Bluffs, Iowa, USA
Ok, before I get into the next topic, which is mostly just an expansion of the previous topic, I have to issue a warning. I’m going to give away a pretty major spoiler here. I went back and forth on whether I should or not, but I decided that to fully be able to articulate my feelings on this subject, I have to. So, here is your chance, if you don’t want something major revealed, skip to the next paragraph now. Ok, those of you who are still here have either read Cujo before, or don’t care about knowing the end. After the whole ordeal comes to a close, Tad winds up dying of dehydration. I wanted (had) to tell you this, because I want to expand on the idea that knowing the ending makes reading the book much more emotional. When reading it for the first time, you can have whatever suspicions you want about how things will turn out, but without knowing for sure, you can’t get as emotionally involved. Also, when you read the book the first time and you find out that Tad dies, you are of course sad. But, then the book is over and you move on. However, when you know that Tad is going to die before you start reading, all of the detail that King goes into to develop him as a character become overshadowed by what you know will eventually happen. I found myself getting emotionally invested in the character, then remembering what would happen, and getting sad for him as I was getting to know him. The other thing that knowing the ending does is it lets you see just how all of the “little” things that happen lead to the “big” thing later on. And each time one of those little events happened, I found myself almost wanting to scream into the book “NO! Don’t do that!! You’re going to be so sorry! Please, just don’t!” When I was younger, I use to like to imagine what it would be like if I had a device that would let you insert yourself into a movie as any character and live in that world. You could follow along with how the movie was supposed to play out, or you could make any changes you wanted to. Then you could pull yourself back out of the movie and watch it to see what would be different. For example, in Aladdin, you could put yourself in to the place of Abu and not grab a hold of that giant gem. Then you could pull back out and see just how things would have played out if that hadn’t happened. As I was reading Cujo, I was reminded of that as I really wanted to be able to just jump into the book and keep Donna from doing the things that I knew would eventually lead her out to the Camber farm and the nightmare waiting for her.
he's helped to craft some of everyone's favourite & most beautiful MAKING-magazines EVER, and his brilliant eye for great design is second to none! a jubilant welcome to the fabulous andrew wagner, our event 1 judge.
Against all those of mixed or Muggle birth.
2) Bring just one pair of comfortable tango shoes if you have them. You will want to pick up more while here, but in any event, it is not necessary to have zillions of different shoes color coordinated to go with every outfit; this marks you as "tourist." Two or three basic black in leather and/or suede will do for the men--goat skin, or cabra, is the most flexible and comfortable. And please don't fall for the two-toned. Ladies only need a pair or two in black, one in red, and another in a color. Beware of glittery or white shoes unless you have perfect footwork.
U. Underwear: Umm...yes...of course
I did straighten up the mess, but it’s still there so try to ignore it. I decided that gravel would be the proper material for the re-formed and new paths. That way the whole back garden will be uniform. I have to buy more, maybe next weekend.
Me: Ya, like that.
Hello, dear readers. I am still here, although I am in an uncommunicative phase right now. No one is hearing from me--neither emails or phone calls or letters, and especially not that blasted IM--so not surprisingly I haven't felt much like blogging either.
It's about...
Q, R, S, T -- Alphabetically speaking, you're okay
'J.Edgar.'
Reaching up to dust the shelves, I find again the journals, a row of frayed black sketchbooks filled with three decades of my story.
They were flaky and buttery yet dense and moist all at the same time.
What makes a distributor different to say a wholesaler is that the distributor, using a team of representatives, is actively selling books into bookstores—the wholesaler is simply a logistical centre storing and listing a catalogue of books, ready and waiting to react to a received order before shipping the product out. Distributors have skilled sales representatives who actively visit and deal with book product buyers in retail outlets, actively promoting and selling the publishers catalogue day after day.
As a child, my brothers were content to play in our dirt yard chained to their posts, but I dreamt of a life less pedestrian.
For the past decade, China has run surpluses on both its current and capital account. When it comes to both trade and investment, China is a net importer of foreign currency, which places pressure on its own currency to appreciate in order to resolve the imbalance. China has prevented the RMB from appreciating more rapidly than it desires by fixing a price at which it buys dollars (and other foreign currency) and stockpiles them as official reserves. Because that price has always been fixed below the market equilibrium point (the RMB has been kept undervalued), whatever limited trading band was set, the RMB tended to bump up against the upper limit. In other words, the RMB was a one-way bet, always under pressure to appreciate against the dollar.
snails
I have a hard time trusting people, especially other women. From my own behavior, I know how destructive and manipulative females can be. I know the games we play to get our way. I am the only woman you need to be concerned with rescuing. No other woman deserves your sympathy. My tears are the tears you should want to wipe away.
In all honesty, Jack has been a pain in his recuperation. I do realize that I have hardly any sympathy or empathy with those who have a low pain threshold. He refuses to take his medicine, which should be fine if he's the only one suffering. However, he's making everyone around him suffer with his crabbiness and misbehavior. I am ready for him to be well. Hopefully 12 hours of sleep will bring him to rights again.
Though vivEkAnanda was also a bengAlI – he did not write bhibhEkAnanda but that is how a bengAlI may pronounce it.
Mags is developing oh so sweetly. She's so smart. We can ask her to go get something or throw something away and she understands and does it! She nods if she wants something and shakes her head when she's not pleased with us. I swear I heard her first sentence the other day. It was probably a fluke, but I gave her a bowl of green beans with a fork and she was patiently trying to poke them onto the fork and I heard her say, "I got it." I turned around to see a green bean on her fork, and I looked at her and asked if she just said I got it. She replied, "Yep." It was probably a coincidence, but it is looking like she's going to be like big sister. Sienna surprised me at 10 months when I sneezed in the car and she said bless you. Mags is a lot more quiet and reserved than Sienna is, but she is a feisty one. Now that Sienna is back, she thinks that she's the boss. If Sienna is requiring to much of my attention, she quietly walks over and slaps her. No bueno. Silent assassin strikes again. We are working on it, and she knows that she is doing something wrong, but with that baby face, she also knows she can get away with it. She has recently discovered that shoes mean go, so she brings me shoes all day long until we go some where. It's so cute. If she catches me putting on make up she immediately goes and sits by the door and awaits her next big adventure. She gets seriously disappointed when I'm just putting it on because Daddy's coming home. It's short lived though, because the second Grant walks in she's all smiles. The girl loves her daddy.
In the last few day, I got two emails from readers telling me that the place is now closed all the time.
Mrs. Many saw the apparition at the window several times. She told her son Frank, but he scoffed at the idea, and paid no attention to the matter at first. Later he spent several nights trying to solve the mystery of the ghost but although he would see her, but she always eluded him.
There is a gem of a commercial idea behind Memeoirs, but I think its founders should take a close look at Scribd - a much larger archiving/publishing platform and decide the longterm direction they wish to take Memoirs in. Where Memeoirs are now is where Blurb were when they launched in the mid-noughties. How much of the fun element do they want to retain, and how best they can move forward with a commercial service.
Teachers across the city lauded the new movement, citing the urgent need to keeping kids in schools and their purpose for waking up each day.
Hooray for life that comes with a mother's love!
Nathan has been going to Kindergarten Club this summer. It's a program that helps kids get ready for kindergarten. They do all kinds of neat things and themes. I should know, as I have gone through the program several times now LOL! This week they learned about bus safety. They also went on a bus ride. Nathan said the same thing all my other children have said "there isn't any seat belts on here...."
Seinfeld had the puffy shirt but Paris has the puffy coat. These shiny black jackets with the fur trimmed hoods are very popular here with both men and women. They pair best with holey jeans, boots, sunglasses, and lots of hair gel for the guys or long stringy hair for the gals. You can pay anywhere from 100 to 800 euros (that's $1,200!) for one depending upon the brand. I guess they are warm but I find them incredibly ugly. For those who've got the dough and like the look, there's still plenty of winter left to get puffy.
Though its colour be not deep and its smell be faint,
They’re supper nice and very talented.
have its foundation on God’s Word. It doesn’t matter how much you anticipate or
- A $20 Amazon gift card
A couple of days later I couldn't stand the suspense any more, so I called the university admissions office. I explained my situation, and the woman on the phone was shocked I hadn't received my notification. Just a minute Honey, I'll go look it up.
Lots of people find it actually powerful to be fortunate at love at instances and it appears that becoming a member of on-line dating companies appears to be the only manner which they’ll find love. Finding that somebody special does not really have to be all that difficult; there are going to be lots of people they are going to be using relationship companies on-line for a superb reason – they’re easy to use.
medical care, balanced meals, regular consular access, visits by
of cash! The people looked upwards nervously as the huge tank of toxic waste was
I said some Choice Words which contained the word Iron and Sodding and You Silly Bugger.
As usual I find space art hidden in the oddest places. During the early 1960s space flight was all about our American heroes. While Scott Carpenter was the first astronaut it was John Glenn who was our first "space hero." Reader's Digest created this anthology of articles for children to read including this article about John Glenn.
"Why," my friend wrote, "are these kids cheering for him and treating him like some messiah? Don't they know his history, that he was an advocate of violence and sat idly by while his organisation committed murder and torture?"
Read and annotate chapters 13-15 of Catcher.
Generation Y is a pretty “loaded” term these days – one that means many different things to many different people. But above all, when I think of Generation Y, I think of “Generation Now”. We may be movers and shakers – we are no doubt the future of society and the world in general, but we’re also incredibly impatient – we’re inundated with stories of entrepreneurship, location independence, and “living the dream”…
After an absolutely glorious and record-breaking spring break week here last week, we are back to single digits and rain this week. We knew it couldn't last!
"We're thrilled to be able to announce such a strong shortlist, so enticing that it will certainly give us a headache when we come to select the winner. The choice will be a difficult one. There is thundering narrative, great inventiveness, poetry and sharp human insight in abundance. These are six writers on the top of their form. They've given us great enjoyment already, and it's a measure of our confidence in their books that all of us are looking forward to reading them yet again before we decide on the prize winner. What more could we ask?"
So I stood holding my first authentic piece of Korean memory, watching it come so close yet stayed so far away, like those childhood jump ropes, flying close, then looping away, never quite reaching me. I looked around the crowded shopping arcade, pressed amongst my own people for the first time, utterly alone.
Well my late arrival, and the even later arrival of my golf clubs and clothes are well behind me and I've been enjoying a relaxing time on the beach at Bijao, Panama, near Santa Clara.
If nothing else we thank God that despite all the unpreparedness, all the unrighteousness, all the bitterness, resentment, anger and wickedness that we have towards God, that he still comes and invites us to the thanksgiving meal of Holy Communion.
It’s all a balancing game on race day.
(I think he looks good in this cowboy hat)
The screenwriting teacher (famous for his screenwriting) says a writer doesn't write dialogue, a writer writes STORY.
That there are ‘ultimate/final’ truths must be abundantly clear by now, and no amount of cowardly relativism will ever succeed in permanently misleading us into believing that that which we are yet not absolutely certain about is but a figment of our mortal imagination. We have been endowed with all the faculties (e.g. rationality) it takes to make sense and find meaning in a world we are, ultimately, not the authors of. And it is precisely those faculties that have impregnated history again; ready to foster the future the West must now bear…in order for the Truth to be.
But first... a few nights in a cottage up in the mountains of the Eastern Cape, bordering on Lesotho. En route, driving through the Free State province, we initially took a brief unplanned scenic road, due to our GPS's wrongly programmed insistence on selecting unpaved roads! While on the rural route, we saw evidence of devastation due to the fairly recent flooding in South Africa, with some of the roads almost washed away.
without reciprocation..
Rolling a ball.
lily was my helper and she lined up the circles for me next to my machine so i could just grab as i sewed.
9Then saith he unto me, See thou do it not: for I am thy fellowservant, and of thy brethren the prophets, and of them which keep the sayings of this book: worship God.
And this weeks top 3 chosen by Laney are...
Now, the Department of Defense has once again attempted to revive this discredited interpretation of the offense with a slight twist. In the new Manual the following official comment has been included in explanation of the offense of Murder in Violation of the Law of War: "an accused may be convicted in a military commission. . . if the commission finds that the accused engaged in conduct traditionally triable by military commission… even if such conduct does not violate the international law of war." Astoundingly, according to the Pentagon, a detainee may be convicted of murder in violation of the law of war even if they did not actually violate the law of war.
We're here on this earth living today to help others. To shelter those in need to rescue those who need rescuing. You need no other reason than having an once of humanity. What if it were your children?
94. Big Nothing *
From there it all began, the quest for the light, the seeking for knowledge
2 ripe bananas, mashed
Did you notice the stacks of needle books I've been working on?
Sept. 24th-26th: Great American Beer Festival, Colorado Convention Center, Denver, Colo.
of down comforters, and pillows.
Cherry Ripe was the elusive one and thanks to a friend giving me the heads up on an ebay auction I now have the complete set of ten.
But you know, I'd microwaved the fuckers so much that the cheese and it's mold melted all over the place.
zoom!
The enormity of what I gave up and allowed is staggering. It’s blinding to see, really see, the life that could have been had I not been hiding in a shell. So many missed opportunities. So many unhappy nights. So little sleep.
The first time I went, I indulged in the 12 euros menu: fresh juice of the day, which that day was an incredible blend of carrot, pineapple and ginger; veggie soup and the bagel sandwich with smoked salmon. I don’t know why it seemed logical to have what was essentially two lunches at once. My belly was bloated the rest of the day, but the food was delicious.
Here are just a few of the articles, blogs, and websites I found. I’ll try to remember to include a few more in my weekly blog. They have already given me some great ideas for characters and their development.
My fondness of you
you love to sit and play with toys.
For over 20 years, I have illustrated the absurd with absurdity, three hours a day, five days a week. In this instance, I chose the wrong words in my analogy of the situation. I did not mean a personal attack on Ms. Fluke.
+ Favorite magazine/ books...
The woman in the show broke down because she remembered her father loves her. Regardless of how we act or where we may be in life, we can be assured our Father has the deepest affection for us. He wrote about that love in a letter.
If you’d like to read the rest of Julianne’s flash fiction called Found: An Interview with Julie!, you can find it here.
Globalization
That you can do something in an instant
The anti-smoker hate groups are currently busy covering their backs now they have created the perfect climate for contaminated smuggled tobacco and exposed more kids to smoking than ever before via the anti-smoker supported black market.
I’m really touched, thank you all for their support, I love you all.
The high price means Disney will have to find new ways to earn revenue from Marvel — perhaps by bringing Marvel-licensed toys to more store shelves around the world, and by digging deep into its comic vault for potential new blockbusters.
Predator
Perhaps representative of the Gnostic branch of bishops in the English-speaking world was one Richard Duc de Palatine, an Australian originally named Ronald Powell, who was initially ordained in the Liberal Catholic Church and, in 1953, consecrated a bishop by Mar Georgius I (Hugh George de Willmott Newman), Patriarch of Glastonbury, one of the most fecund independent bishops. Palatine then founded his own Pre-Nicene Gnostic Catholic Church. Palatine, whose penchant for organising esoteric orders was second to none, also founded the Order of the Pleroma, the Brotherhood of the Pleroma, the Disciplina Arcani, and the Hermetic Brotherhood of Light. These appear to have led a largely mail-order existence.7 Palatine’s episcopal concerns were intermingled with esoteric, magical, and even Freemasonic preoccupations, but in spite of this – or perhaps due to it – some serious modern Gnostics became associated with him. The most notable is Bishop Stephan Hoeller, arguably the foremost proponent of a contemporary Gnosticism.
Kasa Indian dishes @UrbanTableFM Mint Plaza (off of Mission) AND 536 Mission, SF 11-2 THEN 625 2nd st 4-8-Having new veggie specials meeting right meow!
It all starts with the buns and these babies are big ‘uns. They appear to be New England style buns, the type used at lobster shacks to hold a ton of stuff. They’re tall, doughy, slightly sweet and grilled nicely. They put those big buns to use by loading up the toppings to an absurd degree. For some folks, that may fly in the face of tradition. There’s no reason you can’t order your dog more reasonably topped. I enjoyed the topping craziness myself.
I would have to say, my favourite class in Pathfinder is the Sorcerer. For the benefit of the uninitiated, sorcerers differ from wizards in that they derive their spellcasting abilities from a bloodline they inherited from a magical ancestor such as a demon or dragon, rather than through scholarly pursuits. In game terms, this difference means they can cast more spells per day, but are more limited in the number of spells they know. They also receive certain magical abilities such as energy resistances or claw and bite attacks, but are hampered somewhat in their use of meta-magic feats (i.e. special abilities that allow spellcasters to alter certain aspects of spells such as duration, range, damage, etc.)
This was a really nice sketch, the only problem for me is I made the card a little small so I was unable to place a circle of any sort under my character but I think it still turned out OK. The other problem I have with circles is I don't have any tools to make small circles outside of my punches which aren't big enough and my EK Success circle cutter which are too big and I'm still waiting on delivery of my circle and scallope circle nestabilities.
Sunday in London: rainy, cold, blustery. Time to hit the museum! And museums in London are gloriously free. I opted for the Victoria & Albert Museum, for two reasons. First, they have some gowns by Norman Hartnell in their collection, and he's on my family tree (alas, none of them are on display currently). Second, they just opened a Grace Kelly fashion exhibit (alas, it was already sold out for the day when I arrived). So I wound up roaming the collection and snapping photos of all the teaware — in the British collection, in the Asian collection, many continents and many eras.
I have been vigilant in trying to watch for mastitis in the ewes. It’s not easy to spot until you see a ewe that doesn’t want to get up or is lame. Lame? Yes, the infected side of the udder becomes extremely painful and the ewe doesn’t want any pressure against it so she limps. Have any of you women ever had a breast infection? Then you know what I’m talking about.
He will split his time between his district (super small) and ours (very large).
Dies: Go Kreate XXL Frames Frilly #1; Spellbinders Classic Circles; Tim Holtz Sizzlits Festive Greenery
Overall, not a bad idea, but a bit inconvenient if you’re shy a few dangling light bulbs in the first few weeks. But then again, it makes sitting in a lit room feel luxurious.
Chanting "(Put) Akhmetov down a mine shaft !" and "Get Akhmetov out of town", several protesters dumped building material near SCM headquarters to signify their disgust.
Halloween, depending on who you talk to, and sometimes their particular religious leanings, is either a harmless harvest festival filled with parties and candy or a dangerous, unholy pagan holiday for worshipping the dark arts. Holidays like Christmas and Easter have Christian roots yet have developed wide spread secular traditions and observances. Halloween, in my mind is the same, with roots that lay not only in the ancient pagan traditions but in Roman and Christian traditions, as well.
For this weeks challenge, I give you, one of the most beautiful lighthouses I've ever seen.
and urges him to accept it, bending her face to his: “A poor gift,
Another day, another packed commuter train. Am reeling from (mostly) finishing the system plan draft for my site, which has been an interesting experience. You can see the new plan version here, diagrams, charts and all. Speaking of charts, does anyone know an easy PC application (not Microsoft Project) that can create a simple version of said gant chart complete with relationships?
One key reason for the dearth of women is simple: education. According to the Department of Education, just 18 percent of 2008-2009 college graduates in computer and information sciences and support services were women. Especially at a time when women are the majority on college campuses, that is an abysmally low figure.
Anyway, the uncomfortable silence had begun. I could even hear the clock ticking. It ticked and ticked and ticked. I was supposed to say something interesting that would start a conversation, but my mind was so full of “I have to say something!!!”, that I couldn’t think of anything to say. What could I do? Whatever it was, it had to be done fast. The problem was, she was sat at the end of the table, and I next to her, so the only person she could talk to was obviously me, and if I didn’t say something quickly it would look like I was stuck up and didn’t want to talk to her (which is what most people end up thinking about me in the end). I really wanted to say something. There was a question I had been thinking about for around 20 minutes now. I thought, if there’s an uncomfortable silence I’ll use this question. And so I did. I asked her. But she replied with one sentence only, and then the conversation ended again! God, it had taken me almost half the dinner to think about that, and now it had ended in less than 10 seconds. What to do? Fortunately I saw she was opening her mouth to say something, but it was something which makes you want to leave the room screaming. She said: “So, tell me something!.” Why do people ask this? What am I supposed to say? “Yes well did you know I like to surf the internet until 1 in the morning on Wednesdays?” or “Well I’ll tell you, I have an appointment with my gynaecologist tomorrow, what fun!”. I’m sure there is something you’re supposed to answer to this which would be both fun to listen to and would revive the conversation, but over the years I have never been able to figure it out. So I just stood there looking at her like an idiot and thinking “WHAT THE FUCK, WHAT THE FUCK, WHAT THE FUCK. HELP, HELP, HELP” while smiling and pretending to sip some water as if I couldn’t speak because I was too busy drinking. She obviously expected an answer as she stood there staring into my eyes the whole time and didn’t seem to have anything more important to do, so I said “Er…”, which was the best thing I could think of. Fortunately though, my boyfriend came back to the rescue and said “Oh, she’s a bit shy”, which helped me a lot. You know, in case she hadn’t noticed already that I was bordering psychotic. So, she still stared at me. Was she expecting me to do some sort of magic trick? Well, at least then I could’ve found something to say. Anyway, I suddenly got slightly angry (mostly at myself), so I quickly asked her a really random question that had nothing to do with anything at all. But then again, she’d done the same just a few minutes ago, so…! Fortunately it seemed like she liked that topic and so she talked for quite a bit on her own.
Cotton grass grows in abundance all over the tundra. I'm guessing that the cotton falls away from the plant in the fall-time. Here I found a snowy bed of softness. Isn't it pretty? "Come now, and let us reason together, saith the LORD: though your sins be as scarlet, they shall be as white as snow; though they be red like crimson, they shall be as wool." (Isa. 1:18)
He made the disclosure even as he noted that government was prepared to seek the assistance of foreign experts if need be to get to the roots of bomb blasts, saying, “If we try to get the perpetrators and we cannot, we will seek foreign assistance because it is no longer a local matter.”
I have always been an endurance athlete. When I swam, my best events were my longer events (I managed to annoy my coaches quite often by getting best times in sprint events during a distance race), open water swimming is ALL distance, triathlon is a test in endurance, and half marathons and marathons or no sprints either. In fact... I'm pretty much anti-sprint.
Mackerel-scented fingers are too prosaic as a memory trigger and can hardly compete with Proust's madelines for romance, but all the same, I spent the whole journey wrapped in the comforting memories of a blissful fortnight spent in wonderful company, rediscovering simple pleasures.
There is a television station that will list each of the names - all 22,993 soldiers that have died for Israel, another 2,477 victims of terror attacks – all for Israel, for what we have built here in our land. If you want to understand Israel – understand our memorial day. Understand the pain we all feel on this day. Israel is not a nation like other nations. Only Israel would release over 1,000 to get back the one. This year, Aviva and Noam Shalit finally have the answer - no, they will not be sitting on the other side of the small dividing wall because of Gilad.
Take the back roads. Avoid 32, and the traffic. Stop and enjoy the scenery, and eat al fresco at the Crossroads. The $29.95 all you can eat crab special is active. We saw the sign on our way north on the Ten Oaks/Linthicum route the other day.
Thank you for visiting me.
I'm of the opinion, if you don't have something nice to say then say NOTHING. Of course this is simply a motto I try to live by, especially as a writer (not saying I always succeed, but I try). But I do realize that not all will agree with me on this nor will they find this to be a realistic or an effective philosophy to live by.
Dietary Fiber 0.7 g 2.6%
They called me a slacker.
While Steam beer is considered a specialty microbrew style of beer today, it was originally a cheap beer made for blue collar workers. Wahl & Heinus's American Handy Book of Brewing and Malting (1902) describes California steam beer as "a very clear, refreshing drink much consumed by the laboring classes." And while Anchor Steam is an all barley malt beer, additives were often used in the earlier days. According to the book, "malt alone, malt and grits,or raw cereals of any kind, and sugars, especially glucose, employed in the kettle to the extent of 33%... Roasted malt or sugar coloring is used to give the favorite amber color of Munich beer."
I turned the sketch on it's side, used the road as the main design element and then used two different fun scenic papers to complete the look. I just loved those cute little clouds & trees for this look. Granny was done in Memento ink and colored with Copic markers. Isn't she a hoot?! It's a little hard to see but I also added some Sparkling Snow glitter to the stripes on the road and around Granny for a little more "pop". (Remember to click on photo's for the best view).
Noah is not really a fan of the Boppy. A lot of this has to do with the fact that our bed is a queen and the Boppy takes up a good chunk of the middle. You know, that part of the bed that if you are bed hoggers, is a very coveted part of the bed. Well, both Noah and I are bed hogs but since Boppy has joined us, Noah’s section of the bed has drastically decreased in size.
We set up and take down each Saturday morning. We have two shelves in the classroom that we clear of toys and set up the stories and art materials. Here is a picture of our shelves. You can see we are purchasing and making material as we need them so the New Testament shelves are bare. But not for long! I was tempted to spread out the materials so we wouldn't have empty space. Then I thought of the much used phrase, "watch where I go and get this work so you will know just where to find it". I decided empty space was better than constantly shifting everything.
Prospective authors will need to register with JOFDL and make all submissions online:
At anyrate the terms refer to taking something that you already have or something you buy really cheap and making it new or different. You can do this with any belonging but in my case I am interested in doing this with clothes. I do NOT aspire to be any sort of designer or to even make my own clothes, I just like playing around.
—George Eliot, Middlemarch (1872)
- Bloomington Chamber Singers: $855.87 for its annual Messiah concert.
My husband and I learned that teenage boys are nothing compared to girls, and also that in these social media times we live in vigilance is really important. She could just as easily have been communicating with a predator as a boy from her school. Scary thought considering we had no idea how much time she really spent online.
I had a plan for a new start. A friend who was a big boy painting student at the college California told me before I left to make some really big canvas's and get a mop and start smearing on color when I got there...
I was asked by the Deputy Head of Rory's former primary school, Ayscoughfee Hall, where I'm still a governor, to help them with the staff Christmas Panto. Of course, I said, I'd be happy to be involved.
Actually, he's one of my favorite people to read. He is earnest in the very best sense of the word. I love his presentations of photobooks because they allow me to see works I would never otherwise see. I'm amazed at all of the thoughtful posts he manages to put out there. Google the word "conscientious." Colberg comes up as the third hit after Wikipedia's definition of conscientiousness and the dictionary's definition of conscientious. That's pretty much like having Colberg's picture in the dictionary:
Ng said, “Economic diversification and niche tourism activities will characterize the way we move forward for the tourism industry.”
The sentiment is from Stampin' Up.
In a jubilant echo
And of course Daylight Savings Time today. Woot!
“Then what do you want me to say?” His voice was low, thick with lambent power. “That I wanted you to taste me? For all that you’re stubborn, sarcastic, completely unable to take seriously my authority, and patently disrespectful, that I want you? Do you think this is what I would choose?”Is it totally wrong that I want him to choose, ME!? Is anyone else a little hot in here?? *licks lips*
In the summer of 2005 everything exploded. I can’t even tell you how because I don’t remember, but it did. I confessed everything to Patrick. Not out of wanting to repent but because I wanted out of my marriage.
Madeline Zima ... Lily
Newport, KY 41017
And what’s with the ketchup you ask? I guess I just couldn’t go and make fries to eat with a store-bought sauce – I am a food snob after all. But seeing as tomatoes are anything but at their peak, I thought roasting them would be the perfect solution to bring out the sweetness with a touch smoky. Of course you can skip this whole sauce business, but if you’ve never made ketchup before, you’ll be surprised at how simple it is. I got fancy with some interesting flavours, like star anise and balsamic vinegar, but you can leave these out if you’re a purist.
Apple butter.
Most writers sooner or later reach a state when they feel that they no longer have anything worth saying. Verbal semi-paralysis ensues. It used to be called "writer's block," although the term became something of a joke and is no longer used much. But the phenomenon remains.
My Kindle.
Are you in a ‘funk’ because we don’t have a Recap & Review for Glee this week? Well, that’s what happens when the show is in repeats.
Anynoodle, I was walking past the church yesterday and because it was a gorgeous day, I had a skirt on. Gorgeous enough weather to wear a skirt in Scotland is a momentous occasion indeed and our milk bottle legs must be given air (and don't you start about kilts because they're not skirts and we have James Bond who could kick your ass then shag your woman all whilst drinking a martini and he wears kilts, so there).
The coiled "bead" under the fern (dried from my yard) is a piece of hand stamped metal where the "N" ended up backwards. I have yet to learn how to use my metal stamps correctly and not get those "N"s backwards!! Urghhhhhhh So, rolled around a tooth pick and a little alcohol ink, I have a bead. Yayyyyyy, for salvage.
(and then after that, I have to go back, and do all the proper research, so stuff is...right.)
happy friday, dear friends. i can't wait for you to share all of your book covers with me.
So, back to my previous question, are Spain the new European Kings? If you look at the facts & figures then yes, yes they are. As a nation, they are European & World Champions. However, in La Liga, only two clubs supposedly “battle it out” for the crown, Barcelona & Real Madrid. The rest are seen as playing in a league with seventeen other teams competing to come third. If you look at it that way, you can safely say that they are not the Kings of Europe. But why have they got five teams left in both competitions? By far and away a lot more than the other top European leagues can muster. Is it the fact that the Spanish teams value the European tournaments more than what us Brits do? Do we eye domestic success more than ever? Surely not. Yes, you may not win the competition but there are several benefits, for each round you progress, you earn additional money. Squad players or youngsters can gain valuable experience on the European stage and this can benefit them in their further careers.
Tomorrow I will begin number 100, an upbeat non-fiction book called French Dirt , about a man who moves to a tiny village in France, possibly one of the ones Don and I biked through several years ago, and learns to love the people through working on their farms and falls in love with the country for the smell of the soil. Now that's something I can relate to!
*Chest Pain.
Fedorchenko may not be the finest Russian filmmaker alive, but he is definitely immensely talented and worthy of following closely.
I love Thursdays........first.....weekend is near. Second......it's my TV-Day. Vampire Diaries, Bones, Navy CIS. L.A. and Germanys Next Topmodell. Yeah, I'm a junkie. *ggg*
If you've been dating your current partner since you were young, you might think that she doesn't care for flowers. Certainly, that was the case in my situation.
2 1/2 tablespoons melted butter
It takes 3 kg of 239Pu to produce an average size nuclear weapon, therefore sufficient plutonium-239 has accumulated in the typical U.S. commercial nuclear reactor to produce over 446 nuclear weapons.
The other change-ups
Hey, y'all! Have you ever tried to explain the concept of Leap Day to a room full of six and seven year olds?! Phew, that's a tricky one! I'm sure they think I'm crazy after that conversation.
Thanks for the great post Jill! These seem like important points to make.
1. Ann, had a hard time getting started
Obama’s nesting choice is not the only indicator of ‘where he comes from’ – and who he yearns for. Consider this sample page from his Power Place Playbook: his choice of fundraising venue at Harlem’s Red Rooster Restaurant, 29 March 2011. http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2011/03/16/obama-red-rooster_n_836684.html
"You idiot! You've ruined everything! Your scream will bring the whole castle into the stables! I should have stabbed you in the back and left when I had the chance!"
“Yes” is a track off of Acid Black Cherry’s 3rd album, “2012“, which topped the Oricon Weekly Album Ranking for the first time. ‘Re:dream’ was inspired by this song, and will air on BeeTV and other video distributing sites.
People who use the C word aren't necessarily bad people, they're just deviants.
I know that Mother's Day here in the UK was a few months ago but apparently it is just coming up in America. I forgot to post this nice piece of wall art I made for my MIL so thought I'd put it up now in honour of American Mother's Day.
If you did fill out my Campaigner Form before 11.59 EDT, then you're still a Campaigner, even if you didn't manage to get your name on the Linky List on time. Send me an email with the name you want on the List, your blog url, your picture, and the Group(s) you want to join, and I'll add you to the List. Please do this quickly though, otherwise you'll miss out when your fellow Group members get to know each other.
Noise complaints were not the only problem. It was pointed out that there are currently quite a few open NYC Building's Department violations noted for the building housing the bar. In addition, when asked, the owners confirmed that they do not have a Place Of Assembly Permit, though they clearly have more than 75 people (including staff) in their establishment on a busy night. (The owner denied that they exceed that capacity.)
A LOT has happened since I last updated what has been going on in my blog. First, Kal Falco (the alter persona I have had as a Mandalorian) has been retired from the Mandalorian Mercs and he has been deemed “dead” in my book. There will be no more Kal Falco. The “flaming Mando” is now dead. He’s lived for Five Years both with me and with the Mandalorian Mercs, but to be honest, it’s time to put him away for good and for the flaming Mando to be a done deal. I know there are some that will be sad that he’s gone for good, but I feel that it needs to be done as a bit of therapy for me. As far as me doing another Mandalorian, I’m not sure I will. Only time will tell.
as the singer gets closer to the diaphragm. Singers can use this effect to achieve a larger, fatter tone.
I am so embarrassed, truly. I cannot believe it has been over a month since my last post. I knew it had been a while but I had no idea it had been that long. Geez!
First off, they’re all women. I like women’s MMA just as much as men’s so this doesn’t bother me, plus some eye candy occasionally isn’t bad right? Girl’s who watch UFC think some of the guys look good so guys it’s okay to think these girls look good without being sexist, as long as your comments are “Holy crap what a takedown.” and not “Look as her ass.” The problem with most of these fighters is inexperience the card started off with many fighters who have a losing record and they showed why. So I treated it as I would any UFC event and deducted that the last 5 fights would be the main card and everything else was meant to build talent. Many of the women on this card missed weight badly, which is horrible for a professional organization. President Shannon Knapp needs to look into that. By the third fight I decided it’s better to treat them as undercard fighters while only using the top 5 fights to really judge the top talent of Invicta.
Finally the biggest advantage or disadvantage (depending upon the way you look at it) of Mr. Lalit Modi becoming the President of India will be that Narendra Modi will have to wait few more years to stake his claim to become the prime minister since two Modis at the helm will send out wrong signals and their common last names will create a lot of confusion amongst the visiting foreign dignitaries.
a prominent activist and opposition figure, who is sentenced to life imprisonment after being accused of attempting to overthrow the regime and who has been on hunger strike for weeks.
“I pleaded for them to return my money, but my efforts were in vain.
I decided to invite my 11 year old son and 8 year old daughter with me on my twilight run. My son hopped on his Rip Stick (variation of a skateboard) and my daughter hopped on her bike and away we went.
The DP I used is from K& Company called Tablette Matelassee Decorative. The doily is from 'My favorite things and is called High tea. Lace from stash. Roses from WOC and leaves from my punches Leone Em brand.
Project MK-ULTRA, 1953, CIA:
Active lines will ensure that updates аre received аnd communication wіth other online participants іѕ guaranteed. A keyboard and mouse iѕ recommended. The mouse wіth scroll wheel іѕ recommended for thе ultra setting alоng wіth thе multiple buttons feature.
That the people who make you laugh are more beautiful than beautiful people. That you laugh more than you cry. That crying is good for you. That the people you hate wish you would stop and you do too.
Morals of this piece: (1) The banks are lying to Brussels. (2) Merkel is lying to the German electorate. (3) The EU still sees the entire mess as a plot cooked up by the markets. (4) EU officials are lying about the cashflow condition of their banks. (5) Traders on the FTSE must have a collective IQ only just in double figures.
She got lost though, sat down at one of the many crossroads to see what would happen and now she stares at that stranger’s face, at the woman who is lost to her, who stares back from the mirror, wanting to tell her what happened to all those years, all her life, but does not know what to say.
We have to immerse ourselves in the story again and again, detail after detail, to awaken our dull hearts to the price paid for our salvation. The undeserved physical abuse was horrific at the hands of evil men. And the spiritual anguish even worse which made him cry out “My God, my God, why have you forsaken me?” (Ps. 22:1). He was indeed “led like a lamb to the slaughter” (Isa. 53:7b).
Release your inhibitions
Cover and cook on Low heat setting 4 to 6 hours or until noodles are tender.
There's a similar soundclash of folk traditionalism and
Don’t forget that I’m only human. You know how I always tell you that it’s okay to make mistakes? Moms make them, too. And when I tell you to do something and you ask, “Why?” and I say, “Because I said so,” just do it. I don’t care if you think it’s fair or not. No matter what I’ve ever said throughout my life, I paid my dues to my parents and you’ll pay yours. Just wait until you’re a parent. You’ll do it, too, I’m sure.
So Sorry that this post comes a day late! I have been having problems with my computer but all seems to be fixed now - fingers crossed!!
Marriage has become a socially accepted form of prostitution when in reality marriage should be a sacred partnership that is undertaken by two people on the path to spiritual completeness and wholeness.
Stay alert! Watch out for your great enemy, the devil. He prowls around like a roaring lion, looking for someone to devour. Stand firm against him, and be strong in your faith. Remember that your Christian brothers and sistersall over the world are going through the same kind of suffering you are. In his kindness God called you to share in his eternal glory by means of Christ Jesus. So after you have suffered a little while, he will restore, support, and strengthen you, and he will place you on a firm foundation.
Joel Rivera
What are some of the songs that speak to you? Do you have a favorite archetype you write about? Why?
In all the old tales, when the battle is over, the Good go about restoring what the Dark Forces tore down and undid.
I started to freak out a little bit as she pushed up into the higher chapters. The thought that we might need to just skip this entire level and begin working in the next book crossed my mind; and, weirdly enough, my reaction to that thought was, "People are going to think I'm some overbearing homeschooler who is pushing my child too hard." I stopped myself immediately after thinking this thought and reflected--was I afraid to let my child rise to her potential because of the opinions of other people? Was I hesitant to allow my child to progress in the way she needed because I feared the remarks of others who were not present in our classroom each day and therefore had no understanding of what the "math situation" was like? Why in the world was I allowing the predicted opinions of others hinder Bluebird's progress? Why was I afraid?
love makes us cuddle
So here's my thoughts, in a Pro/Con format.
DT: Well, it would be lovely if a few more people read my blog at http://davidtallerman.blogspot.com. And if anyone happens to be at the UK SFX weekender in February, come say hi at the official Giant Thief book launch.
As we all know, Owen is mad at Christina and he can’t take it anymore. Yang has already said that she could care less if he wants to leave but when he says that he is moving out, she struggles to hold back tears.
Me: Ethan? Did you pee down this?
For legal (and health) reasons, I can’t name the thankful threesome. But I can tell you that the ringleader is very well known in international business and sporting circles. However, whether or not their victims call in the Met, in 99% of cases the boys in blue would need a year’s seminar crash-course simply to understand what has gone on, and how the blaggers stand to gain.
Darling also turned 6 and started 1st grade. I can't believe how much she has grown in such a short time. I know it sounds so trite, but it's true. She grew 2.5 inches this summer and her new found "big girl" attitude is just crazy. She was my little, little baby just two seconds ago....
I am a CHA Designer member. If you would like to join this very supportive organization as a Designer too, PLEASE tell them I sent you! Member #310274, if you need help or have questions, please feel free to email me anytime.
Cobalt Blue
It almost looks like a very large hamburger...
i've torn off a bunch of the
To be fair, their behaviour and attitudes, are exactly those which our society tells them to have, all those standards and values which held families and communities together, and which made our nation great are now ridiculed and even condemned.
What a lovely world we live in!
Blue sky, twenty knot wind and 14% relative humidity. Yee-haaw. As it was, they held the fire to just under an acre. While it ended up being not much, remember it is early January. This should not have burned at all.
And we're sticking to it!
With the occupation a month old, the reason I even think about this now is because yesterday afternoon I saw a young woman on the plaza holding a sign that read: “We Occupy Because We Love You”. Regardless of where you sit on the issue, her sentiment was positive and I not only liked that, but I appreciated it. We don’t have to look very far nowadays to find negative news and cynicism and anger and arrogance and outright hostility and it was nice to see something positive right there in front of me. It was nice to see someone doing something out of love. For or against the Occupy movement, everyone needs something positive in their lives. Everyone needs love.
Tanner and his fellow FMC deputies returned to the militia center well after midnight. While the three other men headed for the showers, Tanner turned up hill toward Colonel Hood’s log home. Tanner wasn’t sure if warning away the migrating survivors would work or not. He hoped so. It simply wasn’t in him to shoot families that posed no direct threat.
Because your baby should learn from day 1 that she needs to look good. If your baby is bald, that’s no good to show the world. Instead, show the world a strange, full-head-of-hair, alien baby. I mean your baby’s got so much hair, she’s needs to wear an Olivia Newton John headband to contain it all. Now that’s a baby who’s one step ahead of the curve.
Monkey! Courtesy of my Cricut, and Gypsy. The Gypsy really made cutting out the letters on different colored paper easy. It should have made cutting a monkey of the right size easy...but alas..I ended up with 3 monkeys before I got it right.
Why don’t you eat the Cabal, eh, laddies? Plenty of lizard meat to quell your insatiable hunger.
wrap them carefully to go
Getting wiggly! Not just content to be sat somewhere. He tries to hold his head up after you set him down and wiggles a lot. (see video from the last post)
Most people I know rely extensively on GPS coordinates and all sorts of navigator gadgets to get from A to Z. I often find it quite amusing to listen to younger folk (mainly reps) when I ask them about the towns they’ve travelled through, particularly in the Limpopo province. Their final revelations basically says it all (TIA).
I just released my first published novel SOVRAN’S PAWN last week. It is the first installment in THE BLACK WING CHRONICLES. You can find it in e-book on Amazon and Smashwords. It will be released in paperback in a few months, and later this year, I will be releasing ARCANA DOUBLE CROSS, which is a science fiction adventure from THE MERCENARY
In effect, people give money to other people because, they expect something in return, such as:
The last sticky situation we’re going to discuss today is the buying and selling of coupons, another illegal practice. Coupon clipping services, however, seem to have found a loophole. Instead of selling you coupons, they charge you for the service of clipping them (or for gathering complete inserts) for you. It’s all in the semantics I suppose (?). If you do decide to use a clipping service, never pay them to clip printable coupons for you. You cannot verify barcodes to be unique in order to be sure that they are not photocopies.
I'm so in love with this pasta business. Fresh pasta is just so much better than the dry commercial stuff and homemade pasta is MUCH better than fresh pasta at the supermarket. It is true that it is time consuming, but it's not hard. If you can devote an afternoon to making a few batches you can freeze it and be set for a while..again ask me how I know. I have so many more combinations in my head, flavored pasta, colored pasta, shapes, etc and I can't wait to try them all. Cliche alert......Oh, the pastabilities!
3) Cut a strip of coordinating paper 1/2" by 4 1/2". Adhere this strip to the scallop edge patterned paper piece, about 1/4" from the top edge, and add some faux stitching - I used a white Sakura Gelly Roll pen. The strip will be slightly wider than you need so just trim it after you adhere it. Attach this layered piece to the card base matching the top edges.
Seriously if you can make a peasant(you totally can you know!)you can make this darling little pom pom dress. I know I have raved about many patterns I just feel like this little dress is a breath of fresh air. It's so simple and quick to make, comes with so many options and the design is fresh. I love it. I recently put out my shingle at a teeeeeeeny show at my son's school and I put the Leighanna Pom Pom Dress out with the dresses I make that get the most complements and by far this dress stole the show.
Edward W: Is there a Hot Nerd Girl boot camp my girlfriend can attend?
Dry - dusting (though I don't use it for this, I will get to what I do use later in this series)
Have a wonderful day everyone!
Now (CENSORED) years later, the cafeteria in my office building is offering a special pre-Thanksgiving turkey dinner this week.
I used the same basic cuts list above for the "O". I also cut the lock and key from the Sentimentals Cartridge. I added gold metallic gel ink to the lock and key to give it sparkle. The key is attached using red and white bakers twine. I had some doilies that I purchased at Walmart a couple of years ago for $0.10 after Valentine's Day, so I took two of them and sprayed them with Cherub Pink Glimmer Mist and Shimmerz Baby's Breath Spray. I added faux stitching around the doily using my white gel pen, and then I added seed pearls to the centers of the flowers on the doily with Glossy Accents. I made the rolled roses from textured cardstock, and then air brushed them with my Copic Markers. The tickets are from an old roll of raffle tickets, and I aged them with Distress Inks. The tag and felt flowers were from Making Memories. I dressed them up with some seed pearls I had left over from a sewing project. I adhered them one-by-one using Glossy Accents.
Since its inception in 1857, the City Market continues to be one of the largest and most enduring public farmers' markets in the Midwest, linking growers and small businesses to the Kansas City community. In addition, there are more than 40 full-time tenants that are open year round offering an eclectic mix of dining, shopping, entertainment and attractions. Join us and be a part of a 150-year tradition. This is one of the places we frequent on Sunday and it is amazing each time we go!!
All in all a satisfying ride in the beautiful Blue Mountains
America will reclaim its destiny, its exceptualism, on November 6, 2012. It will elect Mitt Romney.
Not bad, right? Then I got a sudden urge for a snack so I made up something on the spot and o.m.g.-it was delish. I know for a fact that I will be enjoying this for breakfast everyday for a few weeks. Basically I toasted an English muffin (4 pts), spread 1/2 tbs of Nutella on each slice (3 pts) and then topped both slices with sliced strawberries. I'm telling ya, snack heaven.
We at Cooqi are very sad to announce that Cooqi Gluten-Free Delights will be closing its doors, as of April 30, 2010.
Adding to the gaiety of the month is the great sugar crash of the holidays and knowing that the next holiday doesn't come round until April (unless you're a government worker), and that's Good Friday. There's not a whole lot of celebrating going on that day - the celebration is two days later on Easter Sunday. Until then, it's a long slog of five-day work weeks, sitting hour upon hour in front of my computer in my gray cubicle in a brick building under a gray Ohio sky.
1 tsp crushed ginger
2) Those meetings give us valuable information that we might not hear otherwise (or not hear in a timely fashion). Marie Lu's German publisher is making LEGEND their big lead title for fall and sponsoring a German tour! Would this have happened without a Bologna visit? Certainly (as we would have been looped in eventually) but now we are in the know months earlier and can actively help them. Also, they are 10 times more excited to have this big push after we had a lovely sit-down dinner with them and relayed all the latest promo news while in Bologna. We've confirmed they are making the right decision.
Our favorites were two go-big-or-go-home rings, “honkers,” as former QVC host Kathy Levine would call them. First, there was a 24 carat smokey quartz ring, which was enormous. And then there was a 12.6-carat crystal quartz ring that Loren said was exactly modeled after a real diamond — yes, I said diamond — ring that her husband gave her to replace her original CZ wedding ring.
Chapter 13 – Lindsay
Flame asunder this peaceful night
Damien Hirst had a simelar concept with his butterfly piece, where you are in a room with butterfly cocoons stuck to the canvases where you watch them hatch and fly and feed and die, with the flying living butterflies all around you. Again I have been inside a an artwork. Of course there was loads of his other famous work there such as the shark, halfed cow and butterfly collages. The one that stirred me most was that of a white dove with spread out wings suspended for eternity. Where Damien saw hope in this piece, I found it rather unsettling and the dove seemed to blame me personally for it’s situation and seemed to say: ”Look at me, like all the others do. I am destined to be looked and marvelled at forever, without ever feeling the wind in my feathers again. Shame on you, humanity!”
“John was not merely an innovator; “ Dr. Syverson says, “He was a visionary. And he was not a visionary who merely saw into the future. He brought the future he saw into being. And the future he brought into being was dazzling and entirely unexpected. John saw … that technology could become a vehicle for liberation and transformation in the humanities.”
"They won't talk about the racial element of anything that's been deracialized by mainstream media. They're not going to talk about affirmative action, about the racial element of the immigration issue," Rabb said. "Whenever issues of race come up, it's seen as a distraction."
The idea, mentioned in hawkish quarters, of having the Sixth Fleet take over the vacated naval base at Sevastopol would be as rash and provocative an act as having Chinese warships move into Guantanamo, were Havana to expel the United States. But that is unlikely to happen. For Obama appears to be rolling back the George W. Bush policy of expanding NATO into former republics of the Soviet Union. Lithuania, Latvia and Estonia are already members, and Bush and John McCain were anxious to bring in Ukraine and Georgia.
There is much work left to do…
I haven’t been writing because, holy moly, this week has been crazy…and it is about to get crazier. I finally realized I’ve been spending about 15-17 hours at school for every 9-7 hours I’ve spent at home. You would think (hope) that calculation would be the other way around, but noooope. From now until Friday at about 12:30, I am on a marathon of studying. Tomorrow morning at 9:00am, I have a three hour, closed book exam for property. At 5:00pm I have a review session for Prof F.’s contracts class, and on Friday at 9:00am, I have my 3.5 hour closed book, contracts exam. So basically, I have less than a day and a half to learn two semesters of contracts, it involves complex Restatement and UCC statutes, and the contracts test is weighted the most, 6 credits, out of all of my classes. I’m not even being slightly sarcastic about starting from scratch either. In an odd, but extremely scary way, it is kind of a fun challenge…totally different type of ”fun” though I suppose. Sleep is optional, right? Cross your fingers, because I am going to to need all the help I can get.
“What the hell, man. When you were in a relationship with that imp, he told you all this stuff, right? But still he DUMPED you. And now again he will do that. Don’t you see this?”
“Lullaby of Birdland”
Sometimes, fans who are older than me ask me if they can call me “oppa”. These fans look like they’re one to five years older than me. So I just tell them they can. Even though there’s quite a big age gap between my sisters and I and even if I use “hyung” and “nuna” within the company, I am not the kind to be really concerned by the age.
Carrots & Radishes--have no idea when to pluck them.
And there we run into our first problem with white nationalism – it doesn’t confront the core of what is wrong with the West. White nationalists are right that multiculturalism and ethnic infighting are serious issues, but they don’t recognize that the tribal soup that America, Britain and other white nations are drowning in is not the cause of those nations’ decline, but a symptom. To demonstrate this, I will use the time-honored method of the Socratic dialogue:
Looking out of the room, Rome is going under water right now with heavy rain, and it seems that this is a forecast of where the negotiations are going right now. But maybe the forced break due to this weather might help some informal negotiations to lead out of this difficult situation.
So there we all are in the gym/cafeteria/auditorium being taught the Stop, Drop, and Roll by THE Ronald McDonald. No, it never occured to us that there could be more than one. He may have hocked Happy Meals but he was a celebrity in our midst you guys!
For YOU, the 1, who don’t act very nice.
had a wee accident
There are both still and sparkling versions of Brachetto, but for New Years Eve I’m just looking at sparkling options. Brachetto is called a frizzanti in Italy. This means that it is just slightly sparkling. You will not be overwhelmed by the bubbles. You will get flora aromas like roses or violets off the nose and flavors like raspberries and strawberries in the mouth.
I also have babylost friends who have also gone on to have living children since.
When I looked up again, I noticed a tear in his eye.
All the recipes came out very well. The white cake is delicious! It's buttery without being heavy. It's moist enough on its own that it didn't need any syrup to keep it from drying out. It's a little bit on the sweet side for my Asian palate, but I think overall it was a wonderful recipe. The lilikoi curd was also wonderful. I cut down on the sugar for the recipe. The curd was tart on its own, but with the cake on the sweeter side, it matched very well. As for the buttercream, this was a winner!! As I've said many times before, I'm not a big frosting fan. But this is one of the best buttercreams I've ever tasted. I again cut down on the sugar and it was perfect.
What would you do with this tool in your classroom? You can make any assumptions you like about the context it is used in. Post your ideas in the comments below. All ideas are welcome (there are no wrong answers!)
Tonight’s picture is D and Bunny:
But I still don't get it.
freshwater pearls; the painted stripe
wooden dreidel clay dreidel Happy Hanukkah, version one Happy Hanukkah, second version Israel Kiddish Cup Graphic of a Torah, version one Graphic of a Torah, second version Butterflys Are Free Green Cross Mary and Jesus Plaque of Luther’s Rose, first version Plaque of Luther Drawn from the water… Revelations Pastor’s Notes In God We Trust? Dietrich Bonhoeffer Patriarchal Cross pomegranate Reading the Torah Son of Man Footprints In Plaster Floral Cross Nativity Pentecost Title Arabic Looking Jesus Pentecost Dove Descending Baptism Title “I Thirst.” Praise Band in Hot Colors Modern Palm Cross Crown of Thorns
So, for the moment, I continue to stay firmly on the fence. I might buy the Kindle as a Christmas gift to myself, and I might not. I just don't feel that I "need" any of the latest technology (she says as she types on her six-year-old computer), but if everyone else does, and continues to do so, maybe it's time I start to reevaluate.
Infact I found her via facebook.
Travellers arriving back in Britain said the delays were so bad the queues snaked out of the main immigration hall back towards the stands where they had disembarked.
Yesterday a friend's mother passed away. I paused and reflected on a life that I'd only met once. In that moment I was reminded to just keep going and doing because this life is about significance ...not broad fame or success.
Curses!
an Appenzeller Spitzhauben.
We know that the English people, the great majority do not want to pay ”useless” (i would say helpless) people.
This is a “thank you for following” post, because I do want to say thank you to all of you for hopefully reading what I write and enjoying it. I have one year left before I run off the stage skipping with my Baccalaureate of English Writing and Mass Communications degree and I intend to blog as hard as I can (literally, type as forcefully as I can with my face furrowed) until then, hoping someone loves this girl’s writing enough to recommend her somewhere.
So more exactly, this is beginning to look like a sex-for-projects scandal….with the police involved on a grand scale. The Parti Socialiste will of course distance itself from this as much as possible. But graft at this level and with such a depth of grubbiness has a habit of involving rather more people than at first thought. Crucially, it adds a new dimension to the DSK affaire: that of a man not only addicted to constant sexual conquest, but also very probably happy to use his Presidential powers to feed the addiction.
Original Meanings, Jack N. Rakove
I have been waiting for this appointment forever. I really mean forever too. I am nervous and I am excited.
Congratulations Sanne! Please e-mail us with Sketch 140 Prize Winner as your heading along with your full name and mailing address so we can get this prize to you.
You want to remove tax status from organisations which do not do "a great deal of charitable work"? Fine. Start with the fake charity behemoth which Labour created and which you continue to feed. The third sector and the public sector are already inter-changeable much of the time. Let's deal with that rather than impoverishing real charities.
Other resolutions... practise the guitar. Lovely Husband bought me a guitar for Christmas! Yay! And despite the trauma of having to cut my left fingernails down in order to play it, I am really enjoying it. My repertoire consists of 'He's Got The Whole World in his Hands' (a mighty two chords to learn) and... Well, that's about it, so far. Still, if the writing all goes pear-shaped, it could be my next career move, busking on the streets of Britain.
Thy mind to her is now as low as were
I wasn’t going to touch on GoogleApps again until I encountered a fellow student in an undergraduate Spanish translation class I’m taking. We make the assumption that all “digital natives” are web savvy and technologically intuitive, or at least more so than us “digital immigrants.” I know that many of us who work in libraries know that this is not the case, but I must share my experience with this undergraduate student.
" Do you have your rewards card with you today?"
There's paying the ticket then there's surrendering to state-sponsored extortion in the form of outrageously exorbitant traffic fines for only 16mph over the speed limit (there, I did the math for you).
First, thank you Caroline, for inviting me to guest post. It is an honor to be included here among so many authors whom I admire and respect.
The moment someone feels understood their need to talk, explain, or defend diminishes.
“All sorts of ‘secularists’ came forward to join the chorus. New Theologies of Fulfillment, Indigenisation, Liberation, and Dialogue were evolved and put into action. The missionary apparatus multiplied fast and manifold. Christianity had never had it so good in the whole of its history in India. It now stood recognised as ‘an ancient religion ‘”. (Preface)
On hindsight I probably shouldn't have put that image into anybody's mind. I'm sorry about that. But it is hard to pun on "spread".
Priced at £279.99 in the UK and $329.99 in the US, this 10.1-inch tablet packs Android 4.0 Ice Cream Sandwich and serves as a budget option for anyone who doesn’t fancy paying out for the new iPad 3 or other top-tier Android tablets such as the Asus Transformer Prime or Samsung Galaxy Tab 10.1.
I added a little floral motif over the top of some more of the dyed lace acting as moss. The motif is made using stem stitch for the stems, lazy daisies as the leaves with seed beads added to the centers, and for the flowers is 5 petals of ribbon stitch with a slight loop left on the tips and a gold seed bead in the center.
and can’t help thinking
Before Zechariah 1, which is the second last appearance of the angel of the Lord in the OT (the last appearance is in Zechariah 3), the angel of the Lord appears 11 other times, and as I examined all his appearances in the Old Testament I noticed a whole load of strange details when he appears:
At times I feel that my venture into this business is meeting with slow results, but I continue to methodically move forward at a consistent pace to advance my VO career.
Gwen Cherrell – Dreaming of Thee
Reiki can be used alongside any conventional medicine. Here are just some of the benefits that can be obtained from receiving Reiki:
Dirk thinks it's from a deer. But what creature left it??? And how did it take down a deer??? I'm very curious.... and only slightly creeped out.
So today I'm continuing with my little series of photography. Next week was supposed to be photo editing, but I think I'll make it part II of picture taking. This week will be about lighting and next week will be about layout.
And, honestly, so many of those exciting things get buried in all that waiting and writing that I often tend to forget them and what they were like. Keeping a journal with lots of exclamation points is helpful. I think the biggest highlight for me is getting my book delivered to me, and I finally get to hold it, touch it, read it. For me, then it is real. I don't think I'd fare well with eBook only. It's so intangible. So getting my physical book is probably one of the most exciting things - even more than release day. Getting my final cover is also very exciting and memorable.
Linda - 72
Documentary Feature: Hell and Back Again
Just made tea and toasted orange-cranberry bread in this lovely kitchen. It's so wonderful to stay somewhere new, clean and uncluttered, as opposed to old, ehhh and cluttered. There's even a teeny dishwasher!
VII. CONSERVATION AND THE FUTURE
Maria :)
We think we shall pursue this via email for the time being.
This past week, the team and I traveled to Edmonton for a tournament. Why would we drive 12 hours in a rowdy van full of teenagers just for a stinking tournament you ask? Because there is nobody to play with here in the states. Sad, eh? So we trekked to Canada and we ended up doing really well, especially for such an inexperienced group. Our girl’s team won third place and received the bronze medal. The boys team ended up in fifth place. I was so proud, like a proud mother hen.
There were games (like three-legged, and gunny sack races) and other contests to try the skills of all ages. And there was pick-up softball. This was for the older kids and young adults.
I made the decision to receive Jesus as Lord of my life. At that moment, the righteousness that had been upon me came inside me. I was made the righteousness of God in Christ. II Corinthians 5:21 says, “He hath made him to be sin for us, who knew no sin; that we might be made the righteousness of God in him.”
Atonement remedies the strange idea that it is possible to doubt yourself, and be unsure of what you really are. This is the depth of madness. Yet it is the universal question of the world. What does this mean except the world is mad? Why share its madness in the sad belief that what is universal here is true?
Anyway, this post really lives up to the moniker "babbling bandit" as I have carried on way too much. I have a border-line migraine so I'm going to leave it like this rather than try to edit down to something more succinct.
Thank you, again, for making me crazy.
Goosebumps trail my skin as though you’ve read my words…
I looked forward to living with my grandmother while going university (albeit UWI or UTech), I knew where I was going to stay. I (as well as my parent) also knew that if I stayed there, I would be properly fed.. Breakfast, Lunch and Dinner well prepared (and I probably wouldn’t have this MILO addiction now) and well presented just for me to partake.
By good hair I mean well cut and well groomed. The length and colour are secondary when it comes to cutting. I am always amazed how many hairdressers there are in France, in every arrondissement in Paris and in every village in the countryside - hair is a number one priority. I think French women favour geometrical cuts and the sleek look; layers are straighter - chunkier - and have that 'I just got out of bed look'. Coloured hair seems to be less obvious in Paris and more natural in application. (I am not talking about the south now as hair colour takes an entirely different direction down here and not an example to follow...) But colour is not obligatory and grey is not a dirty word - I have seen many a grey headed woman in Paris looking beautiful because her hair is expertly cut and well groomed. For the French hair is about the individual woman not about her age and the care and maintenance of hair is routine - not a cure to be taken once or twice a year. I have learned this from French women - look after the hair and the rest will follow.
Thoughts? Comments? Criticism? Mockery?
I suppose this post arose from my contemplating how TOTALLY AWESOME the Hunger Games movie will be. Then I started thinking about exactly how certain parts would pan out. This was me: “Hmm, Katniss has a lot of inner dialogue and turmoil throughout the book. Considering she’s working alone and the circumstances she’s in, it wouldn’t make much sense for her to be talking to herself all the time. So how does that work out?”
I'd deserve the appropriate sentence - a slap on the wrist, a modest fine, and in the worst cases, a short-ish spell inside. As Chris Bryant says of James Murdoch,
Anyway, I get up to pee and I almost fall over. Like… extreme vertigo. My ears are ringing and my stomach feels like I’m on a boat in the middle of a hurricane and I’m holding on to the dresser as I stumble to the bathroom and I feel absolutely drunk, for lack of a better term. I’m disoriented and confused and nauseous and warm and shaking and I stare at myself in the mirror and I look totally fine. So I decide I must have gotten up too fast and I’m fine and I pee and go back to bed. But the feeling doesn’t go away. I lie in bed and toss and turn Caleb yells out in his sleep and my room swirls around me and I see things I can’t understand or explain, just shadows and nuances of shadows, things that aren’t really there and I know they aren’t there but at the same time I can’t really convince myself they aren’t there. It all sounds ridiculous as I type this, but I know what happened and I know it was terrifying. I pray and I hold on to Caleb and I pray more and I lie tense in bed, sweaty and sick, and I wait for sleep because normally sleep finds me when things like this happen.
The Law of Attraction states; that which we think and feel, consciously and subconsciously, will be attracted back to us, with equal value. Simply put, what you think and feel, what you focus on, you attract back to you in equally. For example, if you wake up “on the wrong side of the bed” and focus on feeling bad then until you change your focus (your attractive co-factor) you will continue to attract “bad” things in return. By the way, it compounds, the more “bad” you feel, the more “bad” you will feel. But that’s not fair, right? Well, it’s not a matter of whether its fair or not, we don’t ask if gravity itself is fair when someone falls off a roof and hits the floor, although some may ask if life is fair in that instance, but how great the fairness of life is is another topic in itself. We can’t question gravity’s fairness, it’s a law. The fact The Law of Attraction is just that, a law, works in our favour. Just as equally as you will attract negativity when thinking, feeling and focusing on negativity will you attract positivity just as much if you think, feel and focus on positivity. So, on the flip side if you wake up feeling “good” and appreciate how well things are or can go throughout the day then equally you will continue to attract equivalent amounts of good. And as before, it’s compounding so the more good you feel, the more good you will continue to attract unless you flip the coin and change your focus to the opposite.
i sure do.
Beth: To me some of this last half truly runs together because I was happy. I was constantly thinking you got this! Let’s get it done! It was also somewhere in here I spotted the 2 hour pace and eventually passed him! YES! Running through numbers in my head and somewhere in here I thought, wait a second, could I get a new PR today?! So I kept pushing. When mile 12 came I knew I’d put in a ton of work and my body could only take so much more pushing. I knew if I did PR it would be a close one and I thought if I don’t I don’t care. I’ve run a strong race and I am so proud of myself! It was kind of nice that Teal and I happened to walk by the 13 mile marker that morning as we made our way to the start and knew just where the finish was.
Hello, Indieful ROK, It's J Rabbit! Glad to meet you all, we are excited and really appreciate doing this interview :)
* Add the chopped ginger, the juice of the 1.5 remaining lemons, and the lemon rinds in large pieces.
Conservative: 3 votes (13%)
We don't like redistributive taxes so you can keep them. You are welcome to the liberal judges and the ACLU. Since you hate guns and war, we'll take our firearms, the cops, the NRA and the military. We'll take the nasty, smelly oil industry and you can go with wind, solar and biodiesel. You can keep Oprah, Michael Moore and Rosie O'Donnell (You are, however, responsible for finding a bio-diesel vehicle big enough to move all three of them).
I'm off for the day- am having contractions and am heading in to doc to check it out & am doubting this is "it" but they make you come in anyway so we'll see. I'll keep you posted!!
Whilst doing some research for Z, I was reminded of this little beauty! From the same author who wrote Winnie The Pooh, this rounds off my A to Z perfectly! enjoy!
As autumn descends like one great gray wet blanket, I’ve been musing on why there is too little laughter in my daily routine. What is there about normal life that smothers it?
Yes, I am a beggar, without pride or even distinct purpose. I long to be filled, given a reason for existing. Not only am I strong enough to hold and carry your burdens, but I can and will encompass all of your joys as well. Help you celebrate even the smallest of these, and do that gladly and with deep gratitude. I can help you in so many ways, to remember specific days, moments, and experiences. I can teach you things you never dreamed, give you more experiences than you have ever imagined. All of this and so much more. But none of this will come to pass unless you move, act. So, I have no problem imploring you to take me, use me, fill me up, and in the process I will become more than I have ever been or could hope to be.
Serve on the side of Citrus salad.
The Chinese government says that the Golden Shield is used primarily for crime control, but opponents argue (quite rightly) that the system can and routinely does snare dissidents in its net. Companies selling technology to China (and other authoritarian regimes) almost always excuse it with the claim that they are merely following the “local laws” of the country they’re doing business in. That’s true. But what happens when those laws are written by authoritarians?
folly to him, and he is not able to understand them because they are
So this is how he ends up more nights than not.
CRS finds that “An extensive empirical literature on [the relationship between income tax rate increases and business formation] is mixed, but largely suggests that higher tax rates are more likely to encourage, rather than discourage, self-employment.” [7] One reason is that taxes may reduce earnings volatility, with the government bearing some of the risk of a new venture — by allowing tax deductions for losses — and receiving some of the returns. Further, there is little evidence that the current preferential tax rates for capital gains and dividends substantially stimulate investment in new ventures.
and bunnies
The Joys of Hell: A Prominent Early Christian Lets Loose Less-Than-Christian Delight in Torture
We knew nothing of boys–there were three girls in my family and John is an only child–and Jake was a challenge. He was a good baby and a sweet child, but he started breaking things at eight months old and never stopped. Teddy arrived only a year later–poor Jake was the baby of the family for only a short time–and they became partners in crime, but Jake was the definite leader as they drove my car into the side of the garage, kidnapped the neighbors kittens, and ran away to “look at Chapman Highway.”
I’m getting views from online places where I talked about my blog, and thus I feel compelled to add something more to this blog. Of course, I know I should offer informative content, delivered in an entertaining way and possibly make you laugh once or twice.
- coffee 2 euro
eggs in ancient patterns like things on the walls of caves
3. John Zorn "Mount Analogue (Cut'n'Paste by LAdD) 6:06
Two things brought this book to my attention. I recently received the Tor Winter 2011 catalog and the cover immediately caught my eye. I had to flip through the catalog that instant to find out what book this belonged to and didn't have to go far. Right on page 1 was The Unremembered by Peter Orullian. Tor obviously has high hopes for the series. The second connection was Brandon Sanderson mentioning the author in our interview with Orullian's book sitting on his nightstand. Tor hasn't released the final cover in color, but here is a picture of the catalog cover, which shows off this lush image.
After our short stop at Koln and Bonne, our next stop for Germany was Frankfurt. First thing that came to mind would be Frankfurters, those yummy sausages. Other than that, I don’t know anything about Frankfurt at all. The city is mainly known for being the financial and business center of Germany, and that can be observed from the attractions the city has to offer.
But still we are not using it. Why?
The midwife in a primary care setting today, whether it's in Melbourne or in a developing country, has the opportunity to prepare women to accept the birthing work of their bodies, and to use their own natural resources to the best of their ability. 'Plan A' is essentially the same, across time and culture. Women give birth spontaneously today the same way as our ancestor-mothers did hundreds of years ago.
U nderneath the snowy skies
Armor was said to fit a man like a glove, yet I have a hard time believing there wasn't some kingly ego-based embellishment going on here. If any of you are knowledgeable about the armor and know why this is so obviously overstated, I'd be curious to hear the story. I mean, I'm guessing it functioned as an overly protective jock strap (must preserve the ability to produce heirs and all that). Still, none of the other suits of armor looked like this...
6. Round & Round (Detroit Mix)
1/2 c corn syrup
From the train we walked to Viktualienmarkt. It is a large farmers' market with all kinds of specialities. If you are interested, there is a lot of information in the link.
We humans run rampant over our domain, the land, but when it comes to the ocean we are like the kid outside the candy store with our noses pressed up to the glass. Sure, we might get to go in every once in a while, but we'll never really know what it feels like to live there. Mermaids, on the other hand, can explore every square meter of the oceans, from the deepest, darkest trenches to clearest crystal beaches. We can never hope to understand or even see every mystery the ocean keeps.
1/4 c oats
by Fadumo Mohamed ( who enjoys reading history books, playing basketball and watching TV.)
Anouk
The story does its job by getting the viewer interested, but virtually any “dark past” story will do that. The story is pretty predictable, but that isn’t what The Bleeding House is about. Obvious clues are given throughout so most viewers will be able to figure out the ending before the middle of the film plays out, but what keeps The Bleeding House engaging are the unique characters that manage to get more interesting as the story progresses, and the wonderful special effects. The work done on each kill is detailed, and always looks realistic. Whether it’s a sliced neck or a bullet wound, The Bleeding House can make almost anyone squirm.
Name Your Link">Baseball season is officially underway which means summer is right around the corner. Having already put out a top five baseball movie list, albeit to some controversy for leaving out Field Of Dreams, it’s time to take a deeper look at the movies on the list and we will include Field Of Dreams when we look at each movie.
Anyway, I did manage to have some fun over the weekend and take some notes on it, so don't think I haven't been fitting beer into my schedule whenever possible.
On the 13th March post I mentioned that I was starting a new project.
Equals –Softly Softly. Nice condition UK Demo
Now, for the fun part- as a teacher, what invention would you love to create? I'm hosting my VERY FIRST linky party, and I can't wait for you to join up and spread the word!
A huge lioness, trying to dig a hole behind a tent, sniffing something every few seconds.
Imagine, the Bengalis though in majority going jubilant in 1956 when Suhrawardy got them ‘parity’ (equal treatment) with the West Pakistanis! Ever heard of a majority people thanking obligingly the minority people for treating them equal?! We did it again in 1971. The minority pronouncing the majority unpatriotic, traitor and secessionist! Minority forcing the majority to leave the country whose foundations they had laid in 1906! Not only, that the Bengalis were treated as unequals, but it is also a fact that they were the major revenue earner for Pakistan, mainly through the export of their Golden Fibre to Manchester and Dundee jute mills in the UK. They bore the major financial burden of Pakistan and happily too for more than 15 years and until 1962 the cash flow was from East Pakistan to West Pakistan.
Pearl: Oh no! Oh no! OOOOOH NO! Ah! Worry! Freak out!
I was made by the Lord for the pleasures of the flesh, just as he made the mole to live underground without light. And just as that creature has everything it needs to live in the earth, I was lacking nothing to enjoy my life of pleasure. I made a vow to kill myself if I were forced by men to knuckle under and live a life other than what my body and soul dictated. Today, I am thinking about that vow. I’m going to leave you. …And Kyra, listen to what I have to say to you. If you Kyra, as I believe, do not feel the need to live a life of virtue, then don’t. Don’t be virtuous if it means you are constrained and shriveled inside. Don’t mock God. Strive to be the best in how He made you. Seek pleasure, even debauchery, but don’t let debauchery harden your heart…and you, Drogomir, if you cannot be a virtuous man, be like your sister and your mother, be a thief even, but a thief who has a heart, for a man without a heart, my children, is a corpse that keeps the living from living their lives.
Brulee blushed and nodded. She did forget that tenant. It was not one her books often focused on; many of the writers focused on the Light’s ideology and healing power.
I'm able to let it go with out working too much at it. At least not on my own.
Figuratively.
the power of a bureaucrat to sweep away our rights
Part 1 of the Frontline episode:
I'm still in the process of filling the petals in. It is taking longer than I expected (big surprise). But the colors look so amazing. So much better than the Cost Plus version, and fully customized to my house.
“Assessments by members of the Pakistan Humanitarian Forum and the National Humanitarian Network show considerable emergency needs and significant protection concerns with families living in overcrowded conditions with little food or water, limited sanitation facilities or healthcare supplies, and limited to no opportunities to earn an income.”
I got totally riled up.
I got “Farm Girl” when it was offered free on Amazon a few weeks back. It’s the first book I have read on my Kindle Fire, and I really enjoyed it. It’s not really a story, but more an oral history of the author’s mom, who grew up in Nebraska during the Depression and Dust Bowl days. Basically, I think the mom shared memories and the daughter wrote them down to form this book. It was interesting to hear about life in our country during that time. There were also many photos, which added a lot to the book. Recommended.
As soon as I got the chance, I emailed my new principal with questions about curriculum, teaching materials, and things like that. As a matter of fact, I have been sitting most of the day and planning out my strategy of teaching to all the students, what technology I would us, what motivation techniques would I incorporate, and what will I do to engage them and make class fun. With this second wind, I began to look back at my successful teaching moments when students got it, enjoyed what we read, did unique projects, and brought a smile to my face. This second wind brought a smile to my face. I am thankful for this.
Thus, we the people do hereby declare not only our rights, but do now establish this bill of responsibilities.
8.Misstep
Hermit – Gidon Saks
–Am I Pregnant or Is Aunt Flo Knocking?
Plus trucks obviously must drive faster than cars whenever possible, and then when they can’t, well then they sit right on your bumper towering over you. I could almost feel their eyes burning through the back of my head as they glowered down at me through the roof of my car.
Castin' out a line to the shadows
Mickey Hart – drums
So lets get started ........
Funny story that... see, the word for poisoner, as one who uses herbs & potions to cause harm, got associated with anyone who was a "witch", which could have been anyone following an older spiritual tradition or just someone who knew some good herbs to help heal someone.
HELON WHEELS!
At first I was so sad about my plate...then my knee started hurting and I had to limp the rest of the day....I am now the proud bearer of a purple, green bruise across my knee...two weeks later! Oh, well...more importantly the cake was delicious! The honoree at the shower loved it and it was super easy to make. I used the food processor method. I think I used a little less butter than called for and it was still good. The crust, of course, was my favorite part! Mmmmm! Another one I'll make again. Thanks for the great challenges!
Awesome’s an appropriate word, because he clearly digs his gig, where he’s been known for nearly a decade as Kevin the Intern — and that title’s not changing any time soon for the 36-year-old.
University of Alberta. Locating McLuhan through Geocaching: A Locative Media Experiment in Downtown Edmonton
I awoke, stretched my arms, yawned.
Overall, I'd say this novel was cute. Monsters are a huge trend in YA lit right now so it would make an okay addition to your collection.
I'm still trying to get my head around "lighter than the lightest lager". Isn't that water? I doubt the soldiers gave a toss. I know how coarse and heavy those British uniforms were. They were doubtless glad of anything liquid and alcoholic. Especially after rolling those barrels up a hill.
Sumac herb can also help in the treatment of common digestive disorders, including stomach upset, acid reflux, constipation, feverish symptoms, and irregular bowel movements. It is believed to contain both antimicrobial and antioxidant effects.
The 'Ultra Mattes V2 - Darks' palette (what a mouthful) comes in one of Sleeks standard, sturdy, black cases with a mirror in the lid and sponge applicator. There is also a plastic film sheet which lies over the shadows, with corresponding shade names printed on to it.
As he got going, his eyes turned to watch my reaction. When I didn’t move to stop him, he started ramping up the volume and raising his arms above his head. Polly followed right along with him and by the time they made their second pass through the Triumphant Peter theme, they were singing so loud that Ava could easily hear them from her spot in the buffet line and the people to our left were openly gawking at us with a mixture of amusement and incredulity.
That leaves the Brits, Danes and Swedish pretty much.
The Blue Hour - named for the blue hue that is indicative of the blue hour in photography - that special time 30 minutes before day light and before sunset. Made entirely of scraps from my stash.
Punctuate Appropriately
Pain had eroded all that once supported me.
and…cornmeal
Our thoughts create our reality. Choose your thoughts and you will choose your reality.
So keep pushing your evil ideology of failure and theft. It's been said the Tree of Liberty must occasionally be watered with the blood of patriots and tyrants alike, and us patriots have had just about enough of your tyrannical ways and that tree is looking a mite thirsty.
So I had to dig deep to discover my method of determining how to write my review. And I found it!
However…. the reality is that women NEED to seriously realize that they are not meant to be and do the work of 10 men regardless if they are able to or not…
(As an aside: One wonders whether these corporates think English as well? Or count, for that matter?)
The article went on to say that, "the police refused to say what led to the paintings' recovery or even where in Norway it took place." This is may be due to an apparent, but unconfirmed connection between the Munch heist and a robbery a few months prior that left a police officer dead.
can’t spell, can’t punctuate.’ Every high school is in disrepair be-
In the Collection of @abeautifulmind1
“One of the two or three best literary critics in America. To virtually any book, Leonard can apply intellect and language without sacrificing either.”—Time
At some point, a trader’s state of mind moves from “having” to “doing.” In a “doing” state of mind, a trader focuses on learning trading methods, and on when these methods work and when they don’t. According to Dr. Tharp, however, traders in the “doing” state of mind still tend to focus on performance issues. They ask the question, “What can this trading method do for me?” They are concerned with how the method can make them rich. Rather than become engaged with the markets, trading in the “doing” state of mind is about evaluating the method, wondering if it is “working.” Trading, however, is not a simple matter of choosing a particular method and arbitrarily applying it. Becoming a winning trader requires honing your trading skills. It is vital that you develop your intuition by trading with a variety of methods under a wide range of market conditions, and finding ways that the proper method dovetails with optimal market conditions. Although it doesn’t tend to lead to enduring profitability, trading in a “doing” state of mind is a vital step on the way to mastery of the markets. During this stage, you gain the experience you need to trade intuitively and in a peak performance mindset. The ultimate state of mind for profitable trading is the “being” state of mind. Rather than focusing on outcomes, a trader in the “being” state of mind is fully in tune with the markets. He or she trades in synchrony with the market action. A firm commitment is made to trading the market and accepting it on its own terms. When a trader works to trade in the moment, he or she intuitively sees profitable setups and effortlessly trades them. It may not happen over night, but with enough practice and experience, you can trade with a “being” state of mind.”
Is it just me?
Label: CBS
Internets, there is nothing left for him to do when he is truly an old man!
New Year’s Eve 2011 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
CA Inmate Realignment: Reckless or Better Rehab Chances?
All of this also makes me wonder, is it the relationship length that is decreasing the desire? Or simply the other milestones (kids, moving in,career moves) that happen to correspond to relationship length? And how do we keep the desire in our relationships over the long haul?
“Dad’s out of work
I had to go looking for a digi stamp for this and found this lovely little set at digi boutique. I bought this one and a female garden version for only £1 each - they're on offer at the mo. Considering I had no clue as to what this card would be when I started I was pleased at how it turned out - I think my 90 year old gardening, church going,bring and buy teetotal man will like it. As for the celebrating maleness challenge well I think I win!! -My man being celebrated is 90 years old so has been male for longer than most - that's something to celebrate all right ha ha.
I have already acknowledged that we cannot, or at least do not, for reasons before accounted for, brew Porter so well here as they do in London; but I dare venture to say, there are many persons who make such Porter as might please any English palate; and a dose of patriotism mixed with it will make it also agreeable to the Scots. Out of a great number of eminent Porter brewers, I shall beg leave to mention the following:— Mr George Miller, St Ann’s yards; Mr James Hotchkiss, Grass-market; Mr Archibald Campbell, Cowgate; Messrs Gardener and Co, Goosedub; the Industrious Company, Edinburgh; and Messrs Cundell and Son, and Mr Matthew Comb at Leith. I have formerly hinted, that the Porter drunk in our taverns and public-houses is not genuine London Porter, but adulterated with small beer. —This fact has been declared by Londoners themselves, and others well acquainted with its true taste. In short, there is hardly a tavern or public house in Edinburgh or Leith, where London Porter, as they call it, is kept, but at least one third of the bottle is small beer, though you pay fourpence and sixpence a bottle for this precious stuff. … Whereas, good Scots Porter, without any adulteration, can be had at threepence a bottle, and excellent strong ale at the same price, at any public house in the town, both of which are better worth the money than the mixed trash drunk by hundreds of dozens in a day, in and about this metropolis. Following his argument that Scottish brewers, blessed with lower malt duty and cheaper coal, should be able to compete easily with imported English beer were it not for the fashion for London Porter, he concludes:
4) I use to dabble in creative writing and had a children's short story, a poem, and a religious essay published.
Naturally, having read the book, I decided to see the movies. I started with the original Swedish version, not just because it was released first but also because I tend to enjoy the original foreign versions of such films better than the American remakes. I thought the Swedish version was fairly well done, and given the shortcomings of filmmaking, I don't think it was a big deal that they changed so many details. I didn't like the movie as much as the book, but that is to be expected.
What do you think that means?
Now you tell me, what is wrong with this picture?
Google will ask whether this is an ecommerce website or not.
Through the dwellers in the crematorium he comes into contact with the Bauls, wandering minstrels. It goes back to the singer of epics in an earlier chapter, because the Bauls wander from place to place, singing songs, but many of them are agnostic, almost atheist, and they reject the conventional religion of temple and mosque, they reject the caste system, and the conventions of society. They are holy madmen, holy fools. Though Dalrymple does not say so, they could be compared to the hippies of the West.
5-4-3-2-1 Single Arm Press (holding 25lb plate in opposite hand at side)
*Aid healthy cell regeneration
The process of evolution can require you to undergo transformations that uproot you. Moving from place to place can seem to literally divide you from the foundations you have come to depend on. Since your home is so intimately tied to the memories that define you, you may feel that you are losing a vital part of yourself when you leave behind your previous house, city, state, or country. And as it may take some time before you fashion new memories, you may feel homeless even after settling into your new abode. To carry your home with you, you need only become your own foundation. Doing so is merely a matter of staying grounded and centered, and recognizing that the pleasures you enjoyed in one place will still touch your heart in another if you allow them.
Then, the application sync’s to a web version of your notes. So I can continue to edit my notes when I’m not sitting at my machine. The changes made on the web sync back to your desktop version. I know that I could do this through Google docs, but I actually prefer working in a native application. Web apps are not as responsive as I often need them to be.
Showed him how much he meant the world to me
The other alternative route to avoid Dairsie Bridge involves Cupar. Yeah, we're pretty much fucked there aren't we. Not only is the town known for it's traffic problems, they've had the B940 bridge across the Eden closed for the last year for strengthening works. So you drive along your alternative route to either find out that the bridge is closed or got the temporary traffic lights of forever telling when and when you can't cross.
One day I will start up a club just for men. No, hang on, they used to have them, but they were forced to admit women..."
Whenever I chat about world issues and the comparison between India and China comes up for discussion with a friend of mine who happens to be an agricultural scientist, he points out that while China has much greater land area as compared with India, much of its land is desert or too saline to grow anything.
The novel follows ‘Peter Jacobs’, a character who finds himself in a very strange room – it is utterly featureless and ‘Peter’ has no idea how he got there or why he’s there. As the story continues it becomes clear – he’s been taken by beings and is being transported to a specific place where he must accomplish something for them.
For my guest I have knowledgeable classic horror lover Jack Veasey from Lavender Lair of Horror to discuss this creepy chiller in all its shadowy, hellish glory. Tune in as we go into the differences between the cuts of the film, occultist Aleister Crowley's impact on the movie, and the need for a little ghostly ghoulishness to spice up the holiday season. Grab some cocoa, throw another log on the fire, and make sure that the dark form floating amongst the trees isn't searching for any runes...
Basically what I’m saying is everything you just said is nonsense with no evidence and a complicated explanation for something that has an incredibly simple, natural explanation. No supernatural forces necessary.
Despite the extraordinary performance the Indonesian team showed, it was Malaysia who later came out as the winner of the tournament. From seven appearances, the Malaysian team won only three times and lost twice, both from their three meetings with Indonesia. Compared to the Indonesian who was only beaten once by Malaysia in the finals and won the rest of the matches during the tournament. Fantastic form, yet ironic result. Malaysia lost the battles but they won the war. But that’s the proof of what the famous sporting proverb says: Form is temporary, class is permanent. Never able to win this lowest-region tournament since its first inauguration in 1996, I reckon the Indonesian football’s class remains low.
Euryale - The character suffers a penalty of 2 on all saves for one month beginning immediately.
I applied three stripes of polish onto a sponge - OPI Nail Lacquer in Rumple's Wiggin' and Barry M Nail Paint in 306 Blueberry Ice Cream. I then dabbed the sponge across three of my nails which resulted in a fading horizontal stripe.
Melt the chocolate either in the microwave or in a bowl over a pot of simmering water.
I love teapots! I think everything about them and tea parties are absolutely adorable. That is why for my 18th birthday my mom got me these absolutely adorable tea party cake Betsey Johnson earrings that I simply adore. But this necklace is just so cute and would look so cute with a t-shirt and jeans and boots in the fall. Its got a bit of simple elegance because of the bead and a bit of whimsy because of the tea kettle style. Love it!
Special Sauce
It's giving away your art deco buffet because you just didn't feel like loading it onto the truck.....the perm you let your mom talk you into, the decision not to take the insurance on your cellphone.
TGWD - Having the kid pre-enrolled at the best evil private schools...
Grey slacks, Talbots - Goodwill
I practiced drawing the pattern for a while, before I finally figured out how I was going to make it work.
They told us to be there at 7:15. Then they called back and said that Xander will be the youngest patient in the clinic that night, so they'd like us to have him there by 6:00 instead. So that's when I got there. No one else was there, not even a receptionist. I spread my overnight bag, laptop bag, pillow, dinner from Sonic, and the car seat containing the boy across one of the couches and a couple of the tables in the room. A sign told me to dial a number and someone would come up front. A woman technician came in, handed me the clipboard full of papers to fill out, and said it might be a little while before they got to us.
In the meantime, I wanted to let everyone know that Copic is accepting applications for the intermediate program. I was fortunate enough to be able to attend the first one in Chicago with the other Copic educators this past fall. It's a really amazing class that can help you to bring your craft to a whole new place. To be able to give your images dimension it's important to think about light, shadow and have a greater understanding of color theory--all of which are discussed in the intermediate class.
Dead End (US…William Wyler)
Faking the smiles for each other
Since Brendon has been traveling a lot lately, I have resubscribed to Netflix. And I've begun watching the Duggar family on 17 and Counting (aka 19 and Counting, but I'm on season 1). I had heard about this family, but since we don't have cable, I have not ever been able to watch it.
However, I was given the opportunity to remember.
Something I need to work on in life is listening.
Nominations are for the year 2011.
Here's the finished painting, too:
Training in “soft skills” required in
I bought EJ her first set of Top Trumps (card game) today, the “littlest pet shop” version she absolutely loves them and deserves them as she has really picked up with her reading abilities of late, she loves books she loves being read to.
Vincent's Blue Caps rocked raw, more desperately than anyone - listen again to Cliff Gallup's outrageous solos on the over-familiar Be Bop A Lula. It's an incredibly sexy record - Buddy Holly had melodic, romantic nous and Little Richard had balls-on-the-line freak energy, but neither made a record that was as intense and panting as Be Bop A Lula. Gene can't wait to tell us about what he's got. She's the gal in the red blue jeans, queen of all the teens, clearly a looker, then he sings "she's the woman that I know". From gal to woman in one verse. With that carnal clue, the song pauses, followed by an untamed, unplanned shriek from the drummer. This and the prophetic, breakneck Race With The Devil were both recorded at Vincent's debut studio session; unsociable and ferocious, these early recordings are very hard to beat.
A.MAZ.ING. I suppose I should be embarrassed by the amount of bread my family and I have consumed all weekend, but at least it's good for us, right?
When I was diagnosed, one of the things that most filled me with fear was the idea that if I died, I would have left so many things undone, and so many necessary changes un-accomplished. Like everyone else, I suppose, I had a long list of "some-days". Some day, I would get around to doing my art classes more seriously, practicing every day. Some day, I would start picking up my Breviary and taking my prayer life more seriously. Some day, I would start taking my language study more seriously. Some day, any day now, I would get serious about my health and pay more careful attention to what I ate, and how much exercise I got. Some day I would go back to making all the clothes I've had swimming around in my head. Some day I would start taking advantage of living in Italy and go see stuff more often, get to know more people, get more into living here.
by Paul J. Stam
Beenie Man (feat. Mya) - Girls Dem Sugar
Everyone wears orange all day, drinks, rides on boats, and sells an array of things in the street. It was such a cool and different celebration to witness. We walked around until we had to catch our airplane back (absolutely exhausted) to Madrid that night.
Shaun Burnie is a nuclear consultant to Friends of the Earth U.S. and Greenpeace Germany. For over two decades he has been a campaigner and coordinator and now consultant to Greenpeace. He has visited and worked in Japan over 20 years – including in support of citizens seeking to prevent TEPCO plans for MOX fuel loading at Fukushima in 1999-2001. He is Scottish, currently visiting the United States.
Because of several personal experiences with ghosts, as well as past-life flashbacks, I became interested in reincarnation and the paranormal. Over time I developed my own spirituality and rapport with the divine, and I drew upon all my beliefs when writing JANE WAS HERE. This makes the novel so much more than an entertainment to me. I am still trying to lift people out of this world!
So here is the recap for the next week:
As I purchased my first home I was kind of excited. Inviting friends and family over as if I just had a newborn. It’s sort of similar in many ways yet, of course, different as well. Slowly I realized what was never told to me.
Thus, he had called the people there to be far-sighted and to give the government a chance, to take them out from the poverty circle.
I don't have a lot of space in my little cottage, so I decided to keep my "wrapping station" under the guest bed.
You just don't know How Excited I was that morning !!! I think Michael is Hands down the Rock Star of Assemblage Art ..
it seems i need to vent again. ignore the capitalization errors im writing from my phone and apparently it doesnt allow me to put in the proper punctuation either.
South African President Thabo Mbeki praised Cuban dictator Fidel Castro for his many years spent brutally oppressing millions of people and went on to say that South Africans could “indeed count on the unflinching support of the Cuban people.”
“We will discuss with you the best combination, compared with the amount you would like to earn, and the Retail Price resulting from that.
In their new term beginning today, Supreme Court justices will hear what the New York Times calls “an extraordinary set of cases that together amount to a project that could overhaul almost every part of the criminal justice system.” The court will decide whether the police need a warrant for advanced technology to track suspects, whether jails may strip-search people arrested for even minor offenses, whether defendants have a right to competent lawyers to help them decide whether to plead guilty, when eyewitness evidence may be used at trial, and what should happen when prosecutors withhold evidence.
Yeah...I thought my effing head was gonna explode. The video interviews were bad enough, but I finally had to turn it off when they started to compare defense spending to welfare.
I drove over towards the Westbury to get a cup of coffee at the paper shop across the road. Not a chance to park, so I looped around and picked up a customer as I went around the corner. The guy had loads of bags and as he was getting in a car behind blew his horn.
Bam! (in case you're feeling all emeril like)
Now, we are headed out to dinner tonight - the five of us.
My cousin, Satan (as in "Get thee behind me...), once brewed an American Wheat beer. He added fresh peaches to the beer while it was in secondary fermentation, and made a pretty tasty little beer that was perfect for summer. I made it the next year, using a kit from St. Patrick's of Austin. As Spring finally comes to the Texas Hill Country, I thought I would make it again.
Yes, it's drinkable. And I might even go as far as to hazard it's refreshing. But it's not something I'd drink by choice. Now let us never speak of it again.
The xbox only comes with 2GB but if you “pay a small amount” you’ll get up to 250GB
www.breakingnews.ie. Headlines as they happen.
The participants were 13 national performance directors (NPDs), with an average of 20 years in elite sports, and had approximately 264 million dollars invested in their programs. After data analysis, 4 majors themes emerged from the interviews: 1) Vision, 2) Operations, 3) People, and 4) Culture. The following will focus on the 1st and 4th themes: Vision and Culture.
The schedule (and my day) are always thrown off-kilter when I miss that step. I don't know what happened this morning... I must have accidentally turned off my alarm, instead of hitting Snooze. But I finally came to and realized it was 7:30 and much farther into the morning's timeline than it should be, considering I was still in bed. Fortunately, not late enough for anyone ELSE's schedule to be off, which meant no kids running around, panicked because they only have 8 minutes to make themselves look too-cool-for-school.
I took the so called "quick" survey, which of course was nothing but. Todd motioned at me several times to come eat before the food got cold. But still I persevered. And when I was done, I told him theatrically, "You know, not enough people bother to take the time to praise companies when they do a job well done. Everyone is quick to moan and complain, but when people do a fantastic job how many of us really show our gratitude?" I felt proud of myself for taking SO MUCH TIME to praise the hospital, my midwives, the nurses on staff, the accomodations, the food (ok, not the food so much)...
We have had a lovely drop of rain here, seeding has begun on the farm and I am feeling inspired to do some more work and planting in the garden.
You know the producers were scrambling. The task was to find Motown acts, still alive, still living in LA, and willing to come out of retirement to sing on a reality show of D List dancers. The set is impressive, the viewership massive… so the appeal is there (and the paycheque). But the BIG problem still remains… how do you FILL a show with live Motown performances from the original artists? You call Smokey Robinsons agent, you call The Temptations and you scratch your head for awhile, then call Martha Reeve. What happens next? Smokey Robinsons agent finds him at Tussauds Wax Museum, The Temptations work on a few moves, and Martha Reeve gets a doctors note to attend.
Durable Design with 2 Heavy-Duty Carrying Handles
9/19 Santa Clara, CA @ Avalon
Now add required water and let this boil...
I just wanted to pop in and wish you all HAPPY HOLIDAYS and a very very Happy 2012.
However it was baseball that the boy with an incomplete right arm loved. In high school he foiled all attempts to exploit his single handed method by fielding bunts without a trouble. He continued to strike people out and fire no-hitters.
Police in Malvern are gearing up for the town’s first emergency services open day this Saturday (5 May). The rear yard of the police station on Albert Road North will be open to members of the public between 11am and 3pm, where members of the emergency services and partner agencies will provide lots of activities for a fun family day out.
one of the most important things to meditate on is a question:
Stoltz releases this 7 inch, a follow up to the Sub Pop album, “To Dreamers.” This single finds itself on the French indie label Les Disques Steak, who’ve pressed some lovely records by the likes of Tyvek, Les Bellas, and Destination Lonely.
Arriving back home in Florida (and before I glanced through my photos), I reflected on the things that had impressed me most about our foray into Chinatown and decided to create a page of impressions because one sketch just couldn't do it justice.
I would like to enter my card into the following challenges:
This is not a pleasant state of affairs. It ought to be possible to have a rational debate about the pros and cons of a particular policy or government action without anyone needing to resort to personal attacks.
“When I heard there would be an apprentice shaman I was so- excited!” that voice hisses at him from across the room. “You haven’t any idea how boring this town has been. Two-house villages are so easy. You should have seen the look on her face when I revealed–”
This makes no sense.
This weekend my company will be dumping 68 TONS OF SNOW on the KC! LIVE Block. Why? Well, because we're having a snowboard tournament in the middle of the Power & Light, of course. Saturday, February 7th. And of course it'll be 70 degrees that day. So you should DEFINITELY come down to see the craziness. It'll be as family friendly as possible, with most of the bars closed during the day. Once the booze-mall picks up steam, the kidlets should have gone home anyway. The later crowd will enjoy the pro-am teams doing crazy tricks on the rails in the later evening.
i am busy with the stuff
drunken laps
That can still be rearranged.
Nobody listens and nobody cares, Nobody even know's he's there
I was really tempted to try to get such a team ready in time for the West Coast Quake. You probably can't imagine how tempted! But, I've been sick for almost a week, have a lot of work to get to, don't want to rush the team even if I could squeeze the time in, and the Orcs deserve their day on the field, they even have Orcvis all themed for the event. So it has to be. But the skinks are on my mind, and they'll have their turn, I have no doubt.
My only exposure to dear Nature is at night, those haunting nights when I walk out of the mall and into the dusk, and the sky is tinted like a purple glass bottle of Poison perfume and the last light of orange is slipping behind the mountains. Those are the nights when I sit staring at the sky beyond the dashboard before starting my car.
Little things really. But they aren't things I normally do all the time. I've been attempting to be nice to myself.
What did anyone else think? Did the NSA have too much power? Did TRANSLTR deserve to be destroyed? Did Tankato and Hale have a point about who will guard the guards? So much to discuss with this one!
⅛ tsp cream of tartar
Tim Winton’s Dirt Music
I just don't understand how he can do so well at preschool, including circle time (I heard wonderful things about his behavior from the end of year meeting) ,then when it is a class that I am forking out money for to help enrich his life, that is when he decides to act up. I know you may be thinking to yourself, maybe he has ADD or "he is just a little kid" but he CAN sit and stay with a task for long periods of time, the trick is it has to be on his terms. Stubborn little kid, I wonder where he gets that from (wink, wink...me). For example today after we got home he sat himself down and colored for 25 minutes straight.
I particularly love #7. "There simply must be a corpse in a detective novel, and the deader the corpse the better."
It’s a major buzz word right now. This is a great way to do interval training without the treadmill/elliptical/bike. The short definition of metabolic resistance training is the use of total body movements (instead of isolated exercises), working at intensity for 30-60s with minimal rest breaks to maximize calorie burn and increase metabolic response.
When the meeting started, the Native Commissioner said, “I am telling you that we made a mistake when we gave Shambare the chieftainship of Chinamora. Now He is dead. It is now in your hands to choose a man to whom you want to give the chieftainship.” When they heard that, Chidziva stood up and explained all the mistakes that had been done and said, “Don’t do such mistakes again. To-day we want to give the chieftainship as we used to do according to our custom. We shall give the chieftainsh to Chigodora, the son of Chihuri of the family of Chinamaringa.” All the people agreed
This area houses Bangladesh’s oldest and largest madrasha, Al-Jamiatul Ahlia Darul Ulum Moinul Islam. The boro-hujur of the Madrasha is also a leader of the Islamic Oikyo Jote ( Islamic Unity Alliance), an important partner of the BNP and the Jamaat-e-Islami. This madrasha has produced graduates who volunteered for the Afghan ‘jihad’ during Taliban rule. Given the large influence institutions under its Depbandi sway wield locally, the events at Nandirhat were the perfect excuse to demonstrate the pent up venom that was being injected for sometime. The local police remained slack onlookers for the first 24 hours, where massive attacks happened in atleast three different waves. Intervention from the highest levels resulted in the imposition of Section 144. Things have been relatively violence-free thereafter.
4. bask in the love from some of the most supportive people on the internet—other writers and artists.
2 pods cardamoms, seeds taken out and crushed in a mortar and pestle
of being able to check out one's very own book selection.
A Reines once wrote this thing comparing Albee's play to Woyzeck and I loved that. I think she is right.
It might be almost two hours until sunset but the moon is up and with my daughter in bed and wife out I am free to launch a guerilla raid on the evening sky.
Here's what happened. The water that I had so gleefully sloshed, before it even hit the floor, it had turned to ice. I had icicles and a sheet of ice covering the car.
Anything to avoid?
So, I stepped out, crossed the road and this street food stall was too interesting for me to ignore. Oh, furthermore... I need to eat. I didn't understand the menu listed - I pointed. What would you like to have?
The story is pretty crazy and far-fetched, but I didn't care. CeeCee Wilkes is a 16-year-old foster kid smitten by a 22-year-old college student who asks her to do an unthinkable thing: kidnap the governor's wife. Out of love for him, she does it, but the results are disastrous. Well, sort of.
These people are insane.
THE BATTLE OF CHERNOBYL dramatically chronicles the series of harrowing efforts to stop the nuclear chain reaction and prevent a second explosion, to "liquidate" the radioactivity, and to seal off the ruined reactor under a mammoth "sarcophagus." These nerve-racking events are recounted through newly available films, videos and photos taken in and around the plant, computer animation, and interviews with participants and eyewitnesses, many of whom were exposed to radiation, including government and military leaders, scientists, workers, journalists, doctors, and Pripyat refugees.
To preface this post, this is what I hope the forgiveness and love of Christ prevents in my future marriage. Marriage wasn’t meant to be war fought between two enemies.
To see your dissatisfaction
8. (I’m adding 1 more because I like to ramble) My biggest thing going on right now is my biggest thing, literally. I’m on a mission to lose a lot of weight. I’ve lost 14 pounds so far and I am hoping to lose 55 by my 55th birthday. I joined a gym last summer but didn’t get any determination until I got the news from my doctor that my cholesterol was quite high. So, I am trying to lose a pound a week. I’m starving myself during the week and eating fun stuff on the weekends..because that is how I roll. I WILL get back to where I was. It’s funny, but I got made fun of when I was in college because I was lucky if I weighed 95 pounds. Even after I had my kids I was able to get back to my 108. Somewhere along the line, I quit caring. Didn’t know I was unhappy all that time. Isn’t that weird? I think I’m a good pretender. Anywho, I am going to get myself back, and then boy am I going to enjoy life. I do now, but it will be better when I can recognize the person in the mirror.
McDonald’s in Paris is a funny thing. Before you walk by the stank of the bathrooms to get to the counter way, way in the back, there’s a “McCafe” where they sell macarons, croissants and espresso. Classic. Only in Paris.
Following are excerpts from a sermon by Sunni Islamic scholar Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Qatar TV on February 20, 2009.
*The games are FREE to play.
90. Yuh gat fuh blow yuh nose where yuh stump yuh toe. Some people take out their anger on those who are nearby but have nothing to do with it.
I expect perfection in/of myself. And that's okay.
for each of us to have the courage
Meanwhile I sip on the tea
Idea-ology: ornate plate, long fasteners, corners, grungeboard heart
﻿﻿﻿﻿From Sydney we spent four days driving along the coast road to Phillip Island in Victoria, where my brother and sister-in-law now live. Fortunately the weather improved!
1. Ukulele Lady
"All clear." Kos smiled. "Jashi's watching the hawk back to the hill-top, but she sent Hullen down here saying it's shown no sign of turning."
In the modern context, honor killings would seem to fit rather nicely into the larger realm of domestic violence, and seem to stem from many of the same circumstances as domestic violence worldwide. Obviously there are people, both Muslims and non-Muslims, who want to attach an Islamic gloss to these killings, but that gloss would seem to me to be both theological illogical and historically unsupported.
Next, I added my YR's. In looking at the photos of barn swallows, I noted that their chests are pale orange to brighter orange, depending on gender. I wanted a base that was not too vibrant, so I went with YR31. Then, I blended in YR12 and YR18. The YR18 was a perfect match for the photos I found online.
So it's all basically the same amount of money, the problem is what to call it. Right now the money is just sitting in bureaucratic limbo, and I supposed it will stay there for the time being.
“I don’t much care where–” said Alice.
and i racked my brain, trying to refind the essence of time that was gone.
Our weather here is supposed to be in the 60's again so I'm hoping hubby and I get out to ride six miles each day for the coming week. If any of you are in need of extra fluff, just let me know and I'll gladly give you mine.
4 tablespoons extra virgin olive oil
